Revision Date: 4/18/2024
Effective Date: 1/1/2020
‍
Introduction
Lookout, Inc. (
“Lookout” or “us” or “we”
) provides this Privacy Notice (the “
Notice
”) to inform you of our practices regarding the collection, use and disclosure of information we receive from users of the lookout.com website, any other Lookout sites that link to this Notice, other Lookout events such as trade shows or sponsored events (collectively, the
"Site"
).
Except where explicitly provided otherwise herein, this Notice applies to information provided or collected through the Site, and other information collected by Lookout offline. Any information collected from you from the use of one of our applications will be subject to a separate privacy notice. Note that Lookout’s applicable terms of service for our services may contain additional notices and terms that apply to our collection and use of data and metadata in connection with your use of those services.
This Notice may be updated from time to time. We will notify you of any material changes by posting the new Notice on the Site. You are advised to consult this policy regularly for any changes.
1. Information We Collect
Lookout may collect the following categories of information, some of which you may voluntarily provide, from your use of the Site:
Identification Data
, including your name, title, job title, and company name.
‍
Contact Data
, including your phone number, address, and email address.
Cookie and Device Data
, including information about your visit of our website, IP address, device identifier, browser type and version, operating system and network, location and time zone setting, and other similar tracking technology as further explained below.
Event Registration Data
, including Identification Data, Contact Data, and other information you provide to us when you access various Lookout content, such as whitepapers, videos, or other research materials.
Job Applicant Data
, including Identification Data and Contact Data, resume and other data provided by you or third parties (e.g. recruiters) on our website in connection with job openings.
Third Party Information
. We may also collect these same categories of information through the use of our third-party marketing and content syndication vendors.
2. How We Use Your Information
We take your privacy very seriously and will only use and disclose this information for the business and commercial purposes described in this Notice. How we use your information will vary depending on the type of data as described below:
Addressing customer inquiries – we use Identification Data, and Contact Data to address customer inquiries so that you may receive a response from us when you contact us.
Sending relevant marketing messages and inviting you to events/seminars – we use Identification Data, Contact Data, Cookie and Device Data, and Event Registration Data to communicate with you by way of email alerts and mail to provide you with information about product announcements, and special promotions from Lookout or our business partners, to invite you to events that may be of interest to you, or to administer participation in surveys, contests and sweepstakes. You can choose not to receive such marketing communications by clicking on the unsubscribe link in our emails, as further described below.
Improving our Site – we use Cookie and Device Data to improve the functionality and user-friendliness of our Site. If you fill out a survey or email Lookout for support, we may retain that information in order to provide you with support and to improve our Site.
Keeping our Site and IT systems and processes safe – we use Identification Data, Contact Data, and Cookie and Device data to ensure the security and confidentiality of your data, and to prevent illegal activities, including fraud, which could harm you and us.
Recruitment – Job Applicant Data is collected and processed for purposes of screening, identifying, and evaluating candidates for positions; and record-keeping related to hiring processes. This processing is necessary in order to take steps at the request of the job applicant in the context of recruitment prior to entering into a contract and may be used as necessary to comply with legal, regulatory, and corporate governance requirements.
You may opt out of receiving promotional communications from Lookout by using the unsubscribe link within each email. Although opt-out requests are usually processed immediately, please allow ten (10) business days for a removal request to be processed.
3. How We Disclose Your Information
Lookout may disclose your information with other members of our corporate family, or with third parties to provide or improve our services. For example:
Third Party Service Providers and Partners
. We may share your information with third party service providers of products and services integrated with our Site that need to know your information for Site improvement purposes. We may share your information with our affiliates, resellers or other third-party service providers that are working with Lookout to perform business-related functions. We may also disclose your information to our third-party partners so they may contact you on our behalf with relevant marketing messages, which you can choose not to receive by clicking on the unsubscribe link in our emails.
Internet-Based Ads
. We may provide your data including the data about your interests in our products to third-parties for the purposes of serving you more relevant ads about our products. Where you are provided with interest-based ads on a site other than our own, we do not track your other activities on that site. For more information, please see Section 5 below.
Cookies
.
To collect and analyze information regarding your usage of our Site as described in Section 5 below.
To Comply with Law
. We may disclose your information consistent with the law to, for example: (i) comply with a law, regulation, or legal process (including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements); (ii) protect the safety or security of any person, entity or facility; (iii) address potential violations of our Notice; (iv) investigate fraud, security, or technical issues; or (v) protect Lookout’s or a third party's rights or property, our employees, users and the public. We strongly believe that you have a right to know if we are required by law to disclose your information. As such, before we disclose your information in response to a law enforcement request (for example, a subpoena or court order), we will notify you at the email listed in your account, unless (a) we are prohibited from doing so or (b) in emergency cases where notice could create a risk of injury or death, or the case involves potential harm to minors. Furthermore, nothing in this Notice is meant to limit any legal defenses or objections that you may have to a third party, including the government’s, request to disclose your information.
During a Change to Lookout’s Business
. We may also disclose your information to an actual or potential buyer (and its agents and advisers) in connection with any actual or proposed purchase, merger, or acquisition of any part of our business, provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this Notice.
Pseudonymized and Aggregated Data
. For data analysis we pseudonymize, aggregate and summarize data that may include some of your data.
With Consent
.
We may also disclose your information to third-parties when we have your consent to do so.
4. Your Choices
Email Opt-Outs
: You may opt out of receiving promotional communications from Lookout by using the unsubscribe link within each email. Although opt-out requests are usually processed immediately, please allow ten (10) business days for a removal request to be processed. Even after you opt out from receiving promotional messages from us, you may continue to receive transactional and product-related messages from us if you use the Lookout’s products/services, in which case you can opt-out of these notification messages in your account settings.
Personalized Advertisements
: You may be able to opt out of receiving certain personalized advertisements from companies who are members of the Network Advertising Initiative or who subscribe to the
Digital Advertising Alliance's
Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising. Please visit the
Network Advertising Initiative Consumer Opt-Out Page
or the
Digital Advertising Alliance Opt-Out Page
to opt out directly from providers who participate in those programs. Lookout does not control or operate these tools or the choices that advertisers and others provide through these tools.
Cross-Device Advertising
: You may opt-out from receiving cross-device site advertising (i.e. tracking a user across devices), by accessing your device setting or visiting and employing the controls described on the
NAI’s Mobile Choices page
.
5. Use of Cookies by Lookout
Like most providers of online services, we use cookies and other tools to collect and analyze information regarding your usage of our Site. Cookies are small data files that we store on your computer or device. For details, see
online cookies information
.
How We Use Cookies
: We use “session” cookies to monitor aggregate usage and web traffic information on our Site. Session cookies disappear when you log out and close your browser. We also use “persistent” cookies to recognize you when you return to use our Site. Persistent cookies can stay on your computer for a longer period of time than session cookies do. We also use “analytical” cookies. They allow us to recognize and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around our Site and how they are interacting with our Site. This helps us to improve the experience on our Site. Finally, we may use other standard technologies, such as clear gifs and local storage to analyze, collect and aggregate data about your use of our Site. We use the data we collect from these tools as described below.
Cookies from Third-Parties
: We believe it is important for you to know what third-party cookies we use on our Site. Listed below are some of the cookies we currently use, and as we develop and maintain our Site, we will maintain a complete list of all the cookies we use at the following link:
https://www.lookout.com/legal/cookie-policy.
‍
‍
Adobe Experience Cloud
— We use cookies from Adobe Experience Cloud (including Marketo, Bizible, and other Adobe products). These cookies help us track your visits to our Site and enable us to create an engaging marketing experience for you, to provide you with relevant marketing information. For example, these cookies let us know information like which emails have been opened, and which links are clicked. You can read the
Adobe Privacy Policy here
,
Bizible Privacy Policy here
, and
Marketo Privacy Policy here
.
G
oogle Analytics
— These cookies allow us to see how you use our Site so that we can improve your experience. We encourage you to read the
Google Privacy Policy
. If you don’t want data reported by Google Analytics, you can install the
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on
.
Google AdWords
— These cookies allow our vendors to serve ads based on your past visits to our sites and for remarketing purposes. Google may use this cookie and other tracking technology to show you our ads across the internet. Google permits you to opt out of Google's use of these cookies by visiting Google's
Ads Settings
.
Greenhouse
— These cookies are used to provide you with a personalized user experience when you apply for a job with us. You can read the
Greenhouse Privacy Policy here
.
LinkedIn Insights
— These cookies help us track your visits and your interactions on our Site so that we can provide you with an engaging marketing experience. They also enable us to deliver more relevant services and content on lookout.com and on LinkedIn’s partner sites. You can read the
LinkedIn Privacy Policy here
.
NextRoll, Inc.
— These cookies help us recognize your device and understand how you use our Site so that we can improve our services to reflect your interests and serve you advertisements about the products and/or services that are likely to be of more interest to you. Specifically, NextRoll, Inc. collects information about your activity on our site to enable us to (a) measure and analyze traffic and browsing activity on our Site; and (b) show advertisements for our products and/or services to you on third-party sites. We may share data, such as hashed email derived from emails or other online identifiers collected on our Site with NextRoll, Inc. This allows our partners to recognize and deliver you ads across devices and browsers.
We encourage you to read the
NextRoll, Inc. Privacy Notice
, and if you are a California resident, then you should read the
California Residents section of the NextRoll, Inc. Privacy Notice
.
How to Control Cookies
: Most Internet browsers automatically accept cookies, but some browsers may permit you to change your settings or use third-party tools to disable cookies or to prompt you before accepting cookies from the websites you visit. These browsers or other third-party tools may also permit you to delete cookies you already have. Please be aware that some parts of our services may not work for you if you delete or disable cookies.
6. Data Retention
‍
Lookout will retain your information, including your Personal Data (as that term is defined by the GDPR), only as long as reasonably necessary to use the Site or as otherwise required for legal compliance purposes.
7. Security
Lookout’s Responsibilities
: Lookout is a security company, and securing your data is important to us. Lookout uses commercially reasonable physical, managerial, and technical safeguards to ensure appropriate technical and organizational measures appropriate to the risk of processing your information. For example, we use a combination of firewalls, authentication, physical security, and other safeguards to protect your account and your data. When you enter sensitive information on the Site we encrypt that information while in transit and at rest using secure socket layer technology (SSL). We also perform third-party penetration tests to harden our systems from attack. Lookout takes every reasonable effort to implement controls to protect against complex technological threats and other criminal threats, as well as to guard against negligent employees.
Because no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is 100% secure, we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information, data or content that Lookout receives on your behalf to operate the Lookout Site, or that you transmit to Lookout. All such receipt or transmission of your information is provided under your own free will and at your own risk. We cannot guarantee that such information will not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards
If Lookout learns of a security breach, we will attempt to notify you electronically so that you can take appropriate protective steps. Depending on where you live, you may have a legal right to receive notice of a security breach in writing.
We Are Not Responsible for Content on Third-Party Websites
: Our Site contains links to other websites. When you click on one of these links, you leave Lookout’s website and go elsewhere. Lookout does not accept liability for misuse of any information by any website controller to which we may link. We encourage you to read the privacy statements of these linked sites, which may differ from ours. In addition, if you take advantage of an offer from one of our partners, you may be providing information directly to that partner. We encourage you to review the privacy statements of these partners, as we are not responsible for the privacy practices of any partners or linked sites.
8. Users Under 16
Lookout does not knowingly collect or store any Personal Data about children under the age of 16.
9. International Data Transfers
Lookout is a San Francisco-based company with servers housed in the United States. Personal Data collected from users outside the United States is transferred to the United States. If you are using the Lookout Site from outside the United States your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed in the United States where our servers are located and our databases are operated.
10. Additional Terms for California Residents
Personal Information:
In accordance with the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act, below is a list of the categories of Personal Information (as that term is defined by the CCPA) that we collect (whether through the Site or elsewhere), the categories of sources we collect them from, the business and commercial purposes for which the information was collected, and the categories of third parties with which we share the Personal Information. The information listed in the chart below is accurate of the preceding 12 months.
‍
Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information:
At Lookout, we will never sell any information that identifies you personally like your name or phone number. However, when you visit our Site, we store cookies on your browser to collect information to make the Site work as you expect it to and to provide you a more personalized web experience, and we do work with advertising partners who use cookies and device identifiers as described in this Privacy Notice to show ads that are targeted to your interests. The disclosures we make to our advertising partners may constitute a “sale” or “sharing” under the CCPA.  Under the law, you have the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information to third parties. You may opt out of these disclosures by clicking the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link at the bottom of the Site. Please note that we do not knowingly sell or share Personal Information of children under the age of 16.
Consumer Rights:
In accordance with the CCPA, and subject to exceptions, California Consumers (as that term is defined in the CCPA) have the following rights:
Access.
You have the right to request that Lookout disclose and deliver the categories of Personal Information (as that term is defined in the CCPA) Lookout has collected about you, or the specific pieces of Personal Information Lookout has collected about you;
Deletion.
You have the right to request the deletion of your Personal Information in certain situations, subject to certain exceptions outlined in the law;
Correction.
You have the right to correct or amend the Personal Information we have on file about you.
Opt-Out.
As stated above, you have the right to opt-out of the sale of your Personal Information as described in Section 10(b).
Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information.
You have the right to limit the use of your “Sensitive Personal Information” (as that term is defined under the CCPA) for purposes that go beyond those permitted in Section 7027(m) of the CCPA regulations. We do not process any Sensitive Personal Information (as that term is defined under the CCPA).
Non-Discrimination.
You have the right to not be discriminated against, including but not limited to the right not to be charged a different price for the services or denying you access to the services, on the basis of your decision to exercise any of your rights in this Section. We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights under the CCPA.
You may exercise your rights to access your information or to delete your information through two methods: (1) complete the webform accessible through
https://personal.support.lookout.com
, or (2) send a request to
Support@Lookout.com
. To verify your identity, we will send a verification email to the email address we have on file for you or ask for additional information associated with your account. If we cannot verify your identity, then we shall not disclose any specific pieces of Personal Information in response to an access request, and we shall deny your request to delete Personal Information in response to a deletion request. For requests to delete your information, Lookout shall use a two-step process where you must first, clearly submit the request to delete and then second, separately confirm that you want your Personal Information deleted. As a California Consumer, you may have an authorized agent make an access or deletion request on your behalf, provided that the authorized agent has your written permission, and you are able to verify your own identity directly with Lookout.
Opt-Out Preference Signals:
If you have implemented an opt-out preference signal (sometimes known as a global privacy control) through your browser or device, we will treat that opt-out preference signal as a valid request of your Right to Opt Out. Once we recognize the opt-out preference signal on our Site, we will automatically apply your right to opt-out of sale and sharing to the browser or device through which we recognize the signal. Our Site responds to opt-out preference signals in a frictionless manner (i.e., you do not need to take any additional steps for your opt-out preference signal to be recognized).
11. Additional Terms for European Economic Area (“EEA”) Residents
Legal Basis for Processing
: If you are a visitor from the EEA, Lookout is the data controller of your personal data. The legal basis for collecting and using your Personal Data as set out in this Notice will depend on the Personal Data (as that term is defined in the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”)) concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only where:  (a) use of your Personal Data is necessary to perform our obligations under any contract with you; or (b) use of your information is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (for example, to ensure the security of the Lookout Site, operate and market the Lookout Services, ensure safe environments for our personnel and others, make and receive payments, prevent fraud and to know the customer to whom we are providing the Lookout Site); or (c) we have your consent to do so (such as for some of our marketing activities). Some processing is done to comply with applicable law.
Data Privacy Framework:
Lookout has self-certified to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “Data Privacy Framework”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from E.U. States, the United Kingdom and Switzerland. The Data Privacy Framework enables companies to comply with data protection requirements when transferring personal data from the European Union, the United Kingdom and Switzerland to the United States. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework and view a list of entities who have current certifications under the Data Privacy Framework, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
As required under the Data Privacy Framework Principles, when Lookout receives information under the Data Privacy Framework and then transfers it to a third-party service provider acting as an agent on Lookout’s behalf, Lookout has certain liability under the Data Privacy Framework if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the Data Privacy Framework and (ii) Lookout is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
With respect to personal information received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, we are subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework, please see Section 13 below.
12. Data Subject Rights
If you are a resident of the United Kingdom, EEA, or another jurisdiction with an applicable data protection law (such as Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Utah), you may have certain rights in relation to your Personal Data. These rights may be subject to certain exemptions. These rights may include:
Access.
You may have the right to request a copy of the Personal Data that we are processing about you. If you require additional copies, we may need to charge a reasonable fee;
Rectification.
You may have the right to require the correction of any mistake in the Personal Data, whether incomplete or inaccurate, that we hold about you;
Deletion.
You may have the right to require the erasure of Personal Data concerning you in certain situations, such as where we no longer need it or if you withdraw your consent (where applicable). In addition to the rights granted under the section above entitled, “You Can Access and Update Your Privacy Settings,” you may contact us at
support@lookout.com
with your request;
Portability.
You have the right to receive the Personal Data concerning you that you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and have the right to transmit that data to a third party in certain situations;
Objection.
You may have the right to (i) object at any time to the processing of your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes and (ii) object to our processing of your Personal Data where the legal ground of such processing is necessary for legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party.
Opt-Out.
You may have the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data, as well as the right to opt-out of the use of your personal information for targeted advertising purposes.
Restriction.
You have the right to request that we restrict our processing of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as when you contest the accuracy of that personal information;
Automated decision-making and profiling
. You may have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you.
Withdrawal of consent.
If we rely on your consent for processing your Personal Data, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any time.
Lodge a complaint to a data supervisory authority.
Depending on your jurisdiction, you may have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data supervisory authority if you believe we are in violation of applicable data protection law.
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us at
support@lookout.com
. We will respond to your request in the time period required under applicable law. Please note that we may need to verify your identity prior to complying with your request. We will verify your identity by sending you an email to the email address associated with your account or by asking you to provide additional information associated with your account. You may also designate an authorized agent to submit a request on your behalf (though we may still need to verify your identity).
13. Data Subject Rights and Choices Under the Data Privacy Framework
Lookout has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. We have also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the "Data Privacy Framework Principles").
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework , and view our Data Privacy Framework certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
As a Data Privacy Framework certified organization, Lookout adheres to the Data Privacy Framework Principles with respect to Personal Data transferred from the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland to the United States.  As required under the Data Privacy Framework Principles, when Lookout receives information under the Data Privacy Framework  and then transfers it to a third-party service provider acting as an agent on Lookout’s behalf, Lookout has certain liability under the Data Privacy Framework if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the Data Privacy Framework; and (ii) Lookout is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
If you are a resident of the EEA, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, then in accordance with the Data Privacy Framework, you have the right to request access to the Personal Data that we hold about you and request that we correct, amend, or delete your Personal Data if it is inaccurate or processed in violation of the DPF Principles. We will also give you an opportunity to opt out where Personal Data we control about you is to be disclosed to an independent third party or used for a purpose that is materially different from those set out in this Notice. If you otherwise wish to limit the use or disclosure of your Personal Data, please contact us via the details provided below.
Additionally, if you are dissatisfied with the manner in which we have addressed your concerns about our privacy practices under the Data Privacy Framework, you may seek further assistance, at no cost to you, from our designated Data Privacy Framework independent recourse mechanism, which you can learn more about by visiting
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
.  You also have a right to lodge a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority. However, we encourage you to contact us first, and then we will do our very best to resolve your concern.
To find out more about the Data Privacy Framework’s binding arbitration scheme please see
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework-article/ANNEX-I-introduction
. Lookout is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC). Please also note that under certain circumstances, we may be required to disclose your Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
14. Contact Us if You Have Any Questions or Concerns
Please contact our Data Protection Officer at
support@lookout.com
, or by postal mail at Lookout, Inc., Attn: Michael Musi, Data Protection Officer, 60 State Street, Suite 1910, Boston, Massachusetts 02109, with any questions or comments about this Notice. Residents of the EEA may also contact by sending inquiries to the attention of Mr. Wim Van Campen, VP, Sales EMEA,  Florapark 3, 2012 HK Haarlem, Netherlands.
Table of Contents
Introduction
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Your Information
3. How We Disclose Your Information
4. Your Choices
5. Use of Cookies by Lookout
6. Data Retention
7. Security
8. Users Under 16
9. International Data Transfers
10. Additional Terms for California Residents
11. Additional Terms for European Economic Area (“EEA”) Residents
12. Data Subject Rights
13. Data Subject Rights and Choices Under the Data Privacy Framework
14. Contact Us if You Have Any Questions or Concerns
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/policy.html:
Adobe Privacy Policy
Last updated: June 18, 2024
The Adobe Privacy Policy describes the privacy practices of Adobe’s Services and Software (as defined in our General
Terms of Use)
and anywhere we display or reference this policy.
If you are a resident of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Inc. (Adobe U.S.) and the laws of California and the United States apply.
If you reside outside of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited (Adobe Ireland), which is the controller with regard to your personal information collected by Adobe, and the laws of Ireland apply.
Please note that in order to use our Services and Software, you acknowledge that Adobe will transfer your personal information across national borders and to other countries where Adobe and its partners and providers operate, including the United States. The privacy protections and rights of authorities to access your information in these countries may not be equivalent to those in your country. We will only transfer your personal information to these countries where permitted to do so by law and we will take steps intended to ensure that your personal information continues to receive appropriate protections. For more information, please see the section “
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
”
If the content or information that you store in Adobe Services and Software contains personal information of other individuals, you must be legally permitted to disclose the personal information to Adobe.
Summary of Key Points
At Adobe we take data privacy seriously. We believe in transparency so you can control your data and make informed choices about how it is used. We are here to support and protect your privacy decisions wherever you use our products and services. Adobe prioritizes your control over the data you store in the cloud in the following ways:
This policy explains when we process personal information for our legitimate interests. You can ask us to stop processing this information.
Learn more about your rights and how you can exercise them.
This policy also explains when we will first get your consent before processing your personal information, including when doing so is required by law.
We use your personal information to enable you to register with Adobe and to provide you with our Services and Software, and other products or services that you request.
We provide interactive features that engage with social media sites, such as Facebook. If you use these features, these sites will send us personal information about you.
We use cookies and other technologies to track the use of our Services and Software. To learn about opportunities to choose not to allow cookies, click
here
. If you are using our website in a browser, this information is also available in our
Cookies Policy
.
There are several places within Adobe’s Services and Software that allow you to post comments, upload pictures, or submit content which will be publicly available where you choose to participate in these activities. We also disclose personal information to other companies in the Adobe family and with advertising and sales partners consistent with your choices. We also disclose information with third parties we engage to process personal information on our behalf or when such sharing is required by law, or in certain other situations.
We transfer your personal information to the US and other countries, which may be outside the country in which you live. We use government-approved contractual clauses such as European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses to help protect your personal information.
What does this privacy policy cover?
What information does Adobe collect about me?
How does Adobe use the information it collects about me, and what are the legal bases for these uses?
Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?
Is my personal information displayed anywhere within Adobe's apps or websites?
Is my personal information secure?
Where does Adobe store my personal information?
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
What rights do I have regarding my personal information and how can I exercise these?
What rights do I have in my state?
Withdrawing consent or otherwise objecting to direct marketing
What information is collected by companies using Adobe Experience Cloud solutions?
How long does Adobe retain my information?
Can children use Adobe websites and apps?
Will this privacy policy change?
Who can I contact with questions or concerns?
What does this privacy policy cover?
This privacy policy describes how Adobe (also referred to as "we," "us" or "our") will make use of your information in the context of:
Adobe websites; web-based services such as Behance; and web-based aspects of the Creative Cloud, Document Cloud and Experience Cloud (together referred to as "websites");
Services that display or include a reference to this policy;
Adobe’s marketing, sales, and advertising practices; and
The privacy practices of previously acquired companies, unless otherwise noted here.
Please note that websites and apps provided by some companies acquired by Adobe may operate under their own privacy policies until their privacy practices are integrated with Adobe's privacy practices. For a current list of these companies, click
here
. Additional privacy-related information for certain Adobe Services and Software can be found in the table below:
Adobe® Digital Editions
Acrobat Sign
Adobe Stock
Adobe Fonts
Flash® Player
Adobe Express Local Ambassador Program
Acrobat
Please also see the
Adobe Terms of Use
and any additional Terms of Use or
Product License Agreements
that may apply to the Services and Software you are using.
What information does Adobe collect about me?
Adobe ID, registration, and customer support
When you register to use an Adobe Service, create an Adobe ID, purchase a license to our Services and Software, or contact us for support or other offerings, Adobe collects information that identifies you. This includes:
Identifiers and contact information, such as:
Name;
Email address;
Telephone number;
Postal or Physical Address;
Country;
Commercial and transaction information, such as:
Payment/billing information (where an app or website is 'paid for');
Licenses purchased;
Eligibility information (e.g., student or teacher identification for student and teacher editions of apps);
Content of and information provided through customer support and other communications (e.g., recorded customer and technical support calls and stored content of your correspondence with us via our website, chat features, phone and video calls, emails, and other channels);
Types of Services and Software of interest.
Professional, education or other demographic information, such as:
Date of birth;
Company or school name;
Title;
Occupation;
Job function;
Expertise;
Company details, such as the size, industry, and other information about the company where a user may work (when the user has provided the company name);
Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as:
IP address;
Browser;
Mobile Device ID;
Browser extensions connected to your Adobe accounts.
Inferred Information
To help keep our databases current and to provide you the most relevant content and experiences, we may infer or generate information based on the information we collect or combine information provided by you with information from third party sources, in accordance with applicable law. For example, the size, industry, and other information about the company you work for (where you have provided company name) will be obtained from sources including, professional networking sites and information service providers. We may also infer, generate, or collect and receive information from third parties, including partners, and from publicly accessible sources, for purposes that include to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraudulent, deceptive or illegal activity, misuse of our Services and Software, security or technical issues, as well as to protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Adobe and our employees, our users, children, or the public.
Adobe Services and Software
We collect information you provide to us (e.g., when you access and use our Services and Software) or permit us to collect (e.g., as part of a third-party integration). We also collect or generate information about how you access and use our Services and Software, including when you use a desktop or mobile app feature that takes you online (such as a photo syncing feature). Depending on the Services and Software you access and use, this information may be associated with your device or browser or it may be associated with your Adobe account or content. It includes:
Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as:
IP address;
Browser and device information, including browser and device type, settings, unique identifiers, version, language settings, and configuration;
Webpage that led you to an Adobe website;
Search terms entered into a search engine which led you to an Adobe website;
Use and navigation of Services and Software, including how you interact with Adobe websites (collected through cookies and similar technologies, or by Adobe servers when you are logged into the app or website);
Analysis of your use and navigation of the Services and Software;
Analysis of your content subject to your opt-out and consent rights.
Professional, Education or other demographic information, such as:
Profile information (e.g., account profile, public profile, Behance profile).
Commercial and transaction information, such as:
Content that includes personal information which is sent or received using an online feature of Adobe Services and Software, or which is stored on Adobe servers, such as documents, photos, videos, activity logs, direct feedback from you, metadata about your content, user generated requests such as search terms, prompts (e.g., text, images, videos, audio, etc.), inquiries, feedback, and other information you may disclose when you access or use our Services and Software as well as any information the Services and Software returns in response to such requests.
Sensitive personal information, such as:
Biometric identifiers or information as defined under US laws (e.g., faceprints and voiceprints from your user Content, as defined in the
Adobe General Terms of Use
) and precise geolocation. Where required by law, we will seek any required permissions from you prior to any such collection. See the "Adobe acting on your behalf" and "How we analyze your content to deliver features requested by you" sections below for more information.
The following links provide further information on:
Adobe product improvement program
;
Usage Data FAQ: Creative Cloud and Document Cloud Apps
Experience Cloud usage information FAQ
;
Adobe Genuine Software
Your
privacy choices
regarding how we use this information;
Adobe products and services licensed by
educational institutions
;
How Adobe uses
cookies and similar technologies
; and
How Adobe
analyzes your content
using techniques such as machine learning in order to improve our Services and Software, and how to
opt out
of this.
Adobe Software activation and automatic updates
When you activate your Adobe Software or when you install updates to the Software, we collect analytics or other electronic network activity information, such as: your device (manufacturer, model, IP address);
the Adobe Software (version, date of activation, successful and unsuccessful updates);
your product serial number (e.g., where this is required before you can start using your product).
You can learn more about app activation
here
.
Adobe emails
Emails we send you may include a technology (called a
web beacon
) that collects Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as whether you have received or opened the email, or clicked a link in the email. If you do not want us to collect this information, you can
opt out of receiving Adobe marketing emails
.
Adobe online advertising
Adobe advertises online in a variety of ways, including displaying Adobe ads to you on other companies' websites and apps and on social media platforms, such as Facebook and LinkedIn. Adobe websites use cookies, pixels, and similar technologies provided by our own company (
Adobe Experience Cloud
) and other companies that allow us to gather additional information to measure and improve the effectiveness of our advertising. We collect Analytics or other electronic network activity information such as:
Which ads are displayed;
Which ads are clicked on; and
Where the ad was displayed.
Learn more about
Adobe’s advertising practices
.
Buttons, tools, and content from other companies
Adobe Services and Software may include buttons, tools, or content that link to other companies’ services (for example, a Facebook "Like" button). We may collect information about your use of these features, such as content “liked” and address information in Google Maps. In addition, when you see or interact with these buttons, tools, or content, or view an Adobe web page or app containing them, some information from your browser may automatically be sent to the other company. Please read that company’s privacy policy for more information.
Adobe websites may implement Google reCAPTCHA Enterprise to help prevent spam and abuse. reCAPTCHA Enterprise collects hardware and software information, such as device and application data, and sends it to Google for purposes of providing, maintaining, and improving reCAPTCHA Enterprise and for general security purposes. Your use of reCAPTCHA Enterprise is subject to Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
Adobe social networking pages and social sign-on services
You can sign into some Adobe Services and Software using a social networking account, such as a Facebook account. Where you give appropriate permissions, we will receive contact and identifier information about you from your social networking account, such as name, country, and basic demographic information.
Adobe has its own pages on many social networking sites (for example, the Adobe® Photoshop® team’s Facebook page). We will collect information which you have made publicly available on your social networking account, such as name and interests in our products and services, when you interact with our social networking pages. The social networking sites may provide statistics and insights to Adobe which help us understand the types of actions that people take on our pages. Where applicable, Adobe and the social media site(s) have entered into an arrangement which determines our respective responsibilities.
You can learn more about Adobe’s practices with respect to social networking pages and account sign-on services
here
.
Adobe acting on your behalf
In certain instances, Adobe is acting only on your behalf for personal information collected and processed by our services (for example, for the address book contacts shared by users when entering recipient information). In such cases, Adobe is acting only on your instructions in order to facilitate the Service requested by you, and you will be responsible for the information shared. In these instances, we will inform you through in-app notifications or other in-time communications. If you submit any information relating to other people to us or to our service providers in connection with your use of Adobe apps or websites, you represent that you have the authority to do so and to permit us to use the information in accordance with this policy.
How we process your content to deliver features requested by you
Adobe offers certain features that let you edit and organize your photographs, videos, and other types of content using characteristics like face and voice (e.g., you can group similar faces, places, and image characteristics within your collection), and such characteristics may be considered biometric identifiers or biometric information under certain US laws or other applicable privacy laws. When you choose to use these features, Adobe is acting only on your instructions in order to facilitate the service requested by you. These features are off by default and, should you choose to enable them, you can always disable these features. Where we process biometric identifiers or biometric information to deliver a feature requested by you, we delete this information once you turn off the feature, unless otherwise specified in the Software or Services.
Visiting our Physical Offices
When you visit an Adobe office, we will collect Identifiers and Contact information such as your name, company name, and email address; and Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information including facial images and voice information such as from CCTV video or voice recordings and photos.
How does Adobe use the information it collects about you, and what are the legal bases for these uses?
Adobe uses the information we collect about you for the following purposes:
To fulfill a contract, or take steps linked to a contract: this is relevant where you register to use an Adobe app or website (whether paid, or as a free trial). This includes:
Providing you with the Adobe Services and Software for which you have registered, and any other services or products that you have requested;
Administering product or platform skill/knowledge courses and other content, including testing and certifications (as applicable);
Verifying your identity;
Processing payments;
Sending you necessary communications (for example, related to payments or expiration of your subscription); and
Providing customer service or support.
As required by Adobe to conduct our business and pursue our legitimate interests:
Analyzing your
content
and its characteristics using automated techniques, in the following circumstances:
Operational Use
. Our Services and Software will access your content stored locally on your device (“Local Content”) and content that you have uploaded to our servers or create using our cloud-based Services (“
Cloud Content
”), to enable the normal running of the Services and Software.
Content Analytics with Cloud Content
. Subject to your opt-out rights, including those described
here
, we may perform analytics with Cloud Content to help us understand how our users are using our Services and Software to allow us to improve your Services and Software experience, provide recommendations to you, and customize your experience. Insights from Content Analytics may be used to inform our marketing to you, subject to your opt-out rights regarding our marketing.
Analyzing your
content
and its characteristics using automated techniques or with human review, in the following circumstances:
Illegal and Abusive Cloud Content
. Cloud Content may be automatically scanned to ensure we are not hosting illegal or abusive content, like Child Sexual Abuse Material. Human review may occur when your Cloud Content is flagged or reported as illegal or abusive.
Public and Shared Cloud Content
. All public and shared Cloud Content is subject to review for intellectual property issues and safety issues (for example, violence and nudity). If you choose to share your Cloud Content with others using our Software and Services, we may automatically review this shared Cloud Content to flag abusive behavior (such as spam or phishing). When you make your Cloud Content publicly available, additional human review may occur.
Providing you with the Adobe Services and Software for which you have registered and any other products and services you have requested;
Analyzing your use and measuring effectiveness of our Services and Software, including recordings, to better understand how they are being used so we can improve them and engage and retain users;
Sending you information about Adobe products and services, special offers and similar information, and sharing your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes, where your consent is not required;
Analyzing your use and navigation of our Services and Software, your profile information, your interaction with our communications (excluding your content), to:
Detect and prevent fraudulent, deceptive, or, illegal activity, or misuse of our Services and Software;
Improve our Services and Software, and the user experience, subject to your opt-out and consent rights, including those described here; and
Tailor and customize the Services and Software through marketing communications (
learn more
)
Diagnosing problems in our Services and Software;
Conducting surveys and market research about our customers, their interests, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and customer satisfaction (unless we need consent to undertake such surveys, in which case we will only do this with your permission);
Investigating and responding to any comments or complaints that you may send us;
Checking the validity of the sort code, account number and card number you submit if you use a credit or debit card for payment, in order to prevent payment fraud or other illegal or deceptive payment practices (we use third parties for this – see “Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?” below);
Sharing account information registered under a business email address with employers for account migration purposes;
Combining with other data we may have about how you interacted with our products and services when logged out or logged in, in order to provide a more seamless experience, show you the most relevant content and services, and for marketing purposes, with your consent where required;
If we merge with or are acquired by another company, sell an Adobe website, app, or business unit, or if all or a substantial portion of our assets are acquired by another company, your information will likely be disclosed to the prospective purchaser, our advisers and any other prospective purchaser's advisers and will be one of the assets that is transferred to the new owner; and
In connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory and investigative purposes as necessary (including disclosure of information in connection with government agency requests, legal process or litigation).
Where we process your information based on legitimate interests, you can object to this processing in certain circumstances. In such cases, we will cease processing information unless we have compelling legitimate grounds to continue processing or where it is needed for legal reasons.
If legitimate interest is not an available legal basis in a particular jurisdiction, we will engage in the processing activities described above on a legal basis that is available in that particular jurisdiction.
Where required,
when you give Adobe your consent
or otherwise consistent with your choices:
Sending you information about Adobe products and services, special offers and similar information, and sharing your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes;
Placing cookies and using similar technologies in our Services and Software and in email communications, in accordance with our
Cookies Policy
and the information provided to you when those technologies are used;
Accessing information stored on your device for the following operational uses:
Information relating to your use of, and engagement with, Services and Software related to crash reports in order to fix the underlying problem causing the crash;
Information which you allow us to receive through device-based settings (e.g., photos, location and camera) in order to provide certain functionality within our Services and Software;
Analyzing your use and navigation of the Services and Software or your content and its characteristics using automated techniques or human review in order to:
Detect and prevent fraudulent, deceptive, or illegal activity or misuse of the Services and Software;
Improve our services and the user experience, such as through the Adobe Product Improvement Program as described
here
; and
Respond to your request (e.g., customer service).
Allowing you to participate in sweepstakes, contests, and similar promotions and to administer these activities.
On other occasions where we ask you for consent, we will use the information for the purposes which we explain at that time. Where we rely on consent to process information, you can withdraw your consent to such activities at any time.
For legal reasons:
Responding to requests by government or law enforcement authorities conducting an investigation.
Using or disclosing information as reasonably necessary to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, potential deceptive or illegal activities, misuse of Services and Software, or technical issues and software piracy (e.g., to confirm that software is genuine and properly licensed), helping to protect you as well as Adobe.
Where this processing and these disclosures are not strictly required by law, Adobe may rely on its legitimate interests, where available, and those of third parties described above.
Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?
Disclosing to other Data Controllers
We will disclose your personal information within the Adobe family of companies for the purposes identified above (see a list of
Adobe entities
and our
acquired companies
).
We will also disclose your personal information with other third-party data controllers with your consent (where necessary) or to provide any product or service you have requested (e.g., third-party integrations). The types of third parties your information may be disclosed to include: our resellers and other sales and advertising partners, retailers, advertisers, ad agencies, advertising networks and platforms, information service providers, fraud monitoring and prevention providers, and publishers. In some cases, in order to show you more relevant ads, we disclose with social media platforms and other advertising partners, information about actions you take on our websites and apps, such as which pages you visit and which ads you saw. These parties may be joint controllers for this processing. More information is available
here
.
Third-party data controllers may also use Adobe products and services to collect and process your personal information. If you are using an email address that is associated with a business domain (e.g.,
yourname@businessname.com
) to access Adobe's Services and Software, or if you were invited to use the Services and Software by a business, we may provide your personal information to that business.
Disclosing for Fraud Prevention, Safety and Security Purposes
We will disclose personal information to companies that help us run our business to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, deception, illegal activity, misuse of Adobe Services and Software, and security or technical issues.
Additionally, we will disclose personal information to companies, organizations, government authorities, or individuals outside of Adobe if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to detect, prevent, or protect against such fraudulent, deceptive, or illegal activity, misuse of our Services and Software, or security or technical issues, or where it is reasonably necessary to protect from harm the rights, property or safety of Adobe and our employees, our users, children, or the public as required or permitted by law.
Disclosing to Data Processors
We will also disclose your personal information to companies that help us run our business by processing personal information on behalf of Adobe for the purposes identified above. Such companies (including those that may record or store communications) include providers of customer support services, chatbots, session replay partners who provide services which recreate a web or app session showing meaningful insight into a visitor’s experience, providers of analytics technologies that record and analyze your interaction with our websites to help us improve your experience, providers of artificial intelligence technologies that record and analyze your content or communications, payment processing services, fraud monitoring and prevention, detecting and preventing deceptive or illegal activity or misuse of our Services and Software, email, social media, and other marketing platforms and service providers, and hosting services. We require these companies to protect your personal information consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Other Information Disclosure
Adobe may also disclose your personal information:
When you agree to the disclosure;
When we have a good faith belief that we are required to provide information in response to a subpoena, court order, or other applicable law or legal process (
learn more
), or to respond to an emergency involving the danger of death or serious bodily harm;
If we merge with or are acquired by another company, sell an Adobe website, app, or business unit, or if all or a substantial portion of our assets are acquired by another company, your information will likely be disclosed to the prospective purchaser, our advisers and any prospective purchaser's advisers and will be one of the assets that is transferred to the new owner.
We may disclose or publish aggregate information that doesn’t specifically identify you, such as statistical information about visitors to our websites or statistical information about how customers
use the Adobe Experience Cloud
.
Is my personal information displayed anywhere on Adobe’s websites or applications?
There are several places within Adobe’s Services and Software that allow you to post comments, upload pictures, participate in message boards or chats, engage with blogs, share technical information, or submit other content for others to see. Sometimes you can limit who can see what you share, but there are some places where what you share can be seen by the general public or other users of the service. Such information can appear in search engine results or through other publicly available platforms and can be “crawled” or searched by third parties. For example, when users post content on message boards, online chats, blogs, and Community Forums, the information posted by the user will become public. Some online content may remain accessible publicly even after Adobe fulfils a request to delete the poster’s personal information.
Please be careful when you share your personal information. Do not share anything you wouldn’t want publicly known unless you are sure you are posting it within an app or website that allows you to control who sees what you post. Please note that when you post messages on certain user forums on our websites and app, your email address or name and/or profile photo may be included and displayed with your message. You can find more information about managing your public profile
here
. To remove content you have shared on our Services and Software, please use the same feature you used to share the content. If another user invites you to participate in shared viewing, editing, or commenting of content, you may be able to delete your contributions, but usually the user who invited you has full control. If you have questions or concerns about this, please
contact us
.
Is my personal information secure?
We work hard to protect your personal information. We employ administrative, technical, and physical security controls where appropriate, such as encryption, 2-step verification, and appropriate contractual confidentiality obligations for employees and contractors.
Where does Adobe store my personal information?
Your personal information and files are stored on Adobe’s servers and the servers of companies we engage to provide services to us.
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
The main locations where we process your personal information are the US and India, but we also transfer personal information to all other countries in which Adobe or its affiliates, providers, and partners operate. We carry out these transfers in compliance with applicable laws – for example, by putting data transfer agreements in place to help protect your personal information.
If you reside outside of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Ireland. Where Adobe Ireland transfers your personal information to a country which is not within the EEA and is not subject to an adequacy decision by the EU Commission, we rely on one or more of the following legal mechanisms: European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses and/or your consent in certain circumstances. A copy of the relevant mechanism can be provided for your review upon request, using the contact details provided at the end of this Privacy Policy. For more information about how Adobe Ireland transfers European personal information, please see
Cross-border data transfers.
Adobe and its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc. comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Adobe has also certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (as does its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc.). Adobe has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF (as does its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc.). If there is any conflict between the terms in this policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. Adobe’s commitments under the Data Privacy Framework are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
As set out above Adobe uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in providing our services to our users and business customers. These third parties may access, process, or store personal data in the course of providing their services. Adobe maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our Data Privacy Framework obligations, including the onward transfer provisions, and Adobe remains liable if they fail to meet those obligations and Adobe is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage).
The information above applies to Adobe users who are consumers. More information is available for our business customers that want to learn more about
Cross-border data transfers
.
What rights do I have regarding my personal information and how can I exercise these rights?
When provided for by applicable law, you have the right to ask us for a copy of your personal information; to correct, delete or restrict (stop any active) processing of your personal information; and to obtain the personal information you provide to us for a contract or with your consent in a structured, machine readable format, and to ask us to share (port) this information to another controller. You may be entitled to additional rights based on applicable data privacy laws in your jurisdiction.
In addition, you can object to the processing of your personal information in some circumstances (such as where we are using the information for direct marketing).
These rights may be limited, for example, if fulfilling your request would reveal personal information about another person, or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law to keep or which we need to defend claims against us. In addition, Adobe websites recognize the Global Privacy Control available in some web browsers. If your browser is configured to send this signal, Adobe will opt you out of Adobe’s use of advertising cookies on that browser. You can learn more about Adobe’s
advertising practices
and your privacy choices
here
.
To exercise any of these rights (including deactivating your Adobe ID account), you can get in touch with us – or our data protection officer – using the details set out below. Additionally, many of our Services and Software allow you to edit your personal information by accessing the "
my account
," "my profile," or a similar feature of the service you are using. Likewise, you can delete files or photos you have stored in our Services and Software by logging in and using the deletion functions that are available.
If you have unresolved concerns, you have the right to report them to your local privacy regulator or data protection authority and, where applicable, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with Adobe Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission.
When you are asked to provide personal information, you may decline. And you may use web browser or operating system controls to prevent certain types of automatic data collection. But if you choose not to provide or allow information that is necessary for certain services or features, those services or features may not be available or fully functional. For example, to register with Adobe, to create an Adobe ID, and to use some Adobe Services and Software, the provision of some information is mandatory: if relevant information is not provided, then we will not be able to administer an Adobe account to you, or provide you with the Services and Software requested. Other optional information, if not provided, may impact our ability to provide a personalized experience or tailored content or offerings.
What rights do I have in my state?
In addition to the rights above, see
Additional US State Privacy Rights
for more information.
Withdrawing consent or otherwise objecting to direct marketing
The Adobe family of companies (see list of
Adobe entities
and our
acquired companies
) and companies we hire to help market our Services and Software on our behalf may use your information to provide you with information and offers related to Adobe.
Where we rely on your consent, you will always be able to withdraw that consent, although we may have other legal grounds for processing your information for other purposes, such as those set out above. In some cases, we are able to send you direct marketing without your consent, where we rely on our legitimate interests. You have an absolute right to opt-out of direct marketing, or profiling we carry out for direct marketing, at any time by:
updating your preferences in your Adobe ID profile;
updating your preferences in your specific website or app accounts;
clicking the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our marketing emails; or
contacting us using the details provided at the end of this privacy policy.
Click
here
for further information on your choices regarding our marketing practices.
What information is collected by companies using Adobe Experience Cloud solutions?
Adobe Experience Cloud solutions help our business customers personalize and improve the performance of their websites, apps, and marketing messages. For example, these customers may use Adobe Experience Cloud solutions to collect and analyze information about how individuals use their websites (
learn more
). The information collected is stored in our services on behalf of and for use by these business customers.
How long does Adobe retain my information?
When you register for an account and create an Adobe ID, we process and keep most personal information we process on your behalf for as long as you are an active user of our Services and Software. We delete certain personal information we collect about you when we no longer have a business reason to retain it. Additionally, there is some personal information we need to retain even after you close your account to comply with business and legal requirements, such as personal information related to our contract and business transactions with you, which we retain for ten years after your last interaction with us.
Where we process personal information for marketing purposes or with your consent, we process the information until you ask us to stop and for a short period after this (to allow us to implement your requests). We also keep a permanent record of the fact that you have asked us not to send you direct marketing or to process your information so that we can respect your request in the future.
Can children use Adobe websites and apps?
Adobe Services and Software are not intended for children under the age of 13, except in limited situations where certain products, including Adobe Express and Creative Cloud All Apps, may be available to children for educational purposes under the direct supervision of a teacher. In these circumstances, Adobe is authorized to collect student data by the participating school, which has obtained appropriate consent, if needed.
Adobe’s Direct COPPA Notice
provides more information about the collection and use of student data.
All other Adobe Services and Software are not intended for use by children and certain products specifically prohibit users who are under a certain age. If you do not meet applicable age requirements, please do not use those Services and Software. If you are age 13 or over and meet applicable age requirements to use certain Services and Software, Adobe makes available
Privacy for Younger Users
page to provide information about our privacy practices in an age-appropriate format.
Will this privacy policy change?
Occasionally, we may update this privacy policy (or other documents in the Adobe Privacy Center) to allow Adobe to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements or for other purposes. If we do, we will change the "last updated" date at the top of this policy and the revised policy will be posted to this page so that you are aware of the information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances we may disclose it. We encourage you to periodically review the
Adobe Privacy Center
for the latest information on our privacy practices. Under certain circumstances (for example with certain material changes or where it is required by applicable privacy laws) we will provide notice to you of these changes and, where required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent. Notice may be by email to you, by posting a notice of such changes on our Services and Software, or by other means consistent with applicable law.
Who can I contact with questions or concerns?
If you have a privacy question, concern, or request, please fill out a
privacy inquiry form
.
If you are outside North America, you can also get in touch with Adobe Ireland's data protection officer at
DPO@Adobe.com
or by postal mail at 4-6 Riverwalk, Citywest Business Park, Dublin 24, Ireland.
For practices that are covered by our
PRP Certification
, if you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you believe Adobe maintains your personal data in one of the services within the scope of our Data Privacy Framework certification, you may direct any inquiries or complaints concerning our Data Privacy Framework compliance by filling in our privacy inquiry form. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://www.ana.net/content/show/id/accountability-dpf-consumers
. If neither Adobe nor our dispute resolution provider resolves your complaint, you may have the possibility to engage in binding arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see Annex I of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.bizible.com/privacy-policy:
Home
Products
Adobe Marketo Engage
Adobe Marketo Measure
linear-gradient(45deg, #A7E7ED 0%, #DEF5F6 56%, #C7F8FD 100%),linear-gradient(0deg, #ffffff 0%, #ffffff 100%)
ADOBE MARKETO MEASURE
Maximize your marketing budget with precision.
Marketo Measure, an industry-leading B2B marketing attribution tool, lets marketers measure campaign, channel, and content impact on pipeline, revenue, and ROI — empowering them to continuously optimize tactics and investments.
Complete B2B marketing attribution — powered by AI.
Most traditional attribution methods are limited to campaign-associated touchpoints, but Marketo Measure has every-touch attribution. It gives you the complete view of progression and performance to fully optimize your marketing mix at every stage and for every go-to-market motion.
style
Grid-width-10
Every-touch data aggregation
Legacy single-touch and multi-touch attribution processes are often invalidated from the start by incomplete data. Marketo Measure leverages native integrations to aggregate and account for every trackable buyer touchpoint across marketing and sales, including the first touch, closed/won, and online and offline interactions. These touchpoints are contextualized by stage progression throughout the buyer journey.
Omnichannel aggregation
Automatically capture buyer-touchpoint data across online and offline channels to get a complete view of B2B buyer interactions and accurate attribution. Marketo Measure not only catalogs multiple touchpoints, it stores more metadata about each one, providing highly granular insight.
Online channels.
Collect touchpoint data for paid media — such as LinkedIn and Google — as well as data from website interactions, chat, email, webinars, and more.
Offline channels.
Gather data from channels such as physical events, content syndication, direct mail, and more.
Business development representative (BDR) and sales activities.
Get a complete view of your customers by incorporating touchpoints from business development and sales — including calls, emails, and meetings.
Campaign and content associations
Leverage native touchpoint-to-campaign and touchpoint-to-content associations to reveal attribution insights across paid media, marketing automation, and search campaigns.
Campaign tracking.
Consider every touchpoint associated with CRM campaigns, paid media campaigns, or marketing automation programs.
Gated and ungated content.
Track content -to quantify its business value and show which investments best support progression and wins.
Search keywords.
Monitor ad variations and keywords for paid search ads to understand what topics and terms are leading to revenue, not just engagement.
Flexible data framework
Generate performance insights configured to your unique marketing taxonomy, demand stages, and go-to-market (GTM) motions. Marketo Measure lets you track channels, progression stages, and more based on your preferences to ensure insights support your business.
Custom channels.
Configure channels in Marketo Measure based on your preferred names and hierarchies.
Custom stages.
Set up buyer progression stages based on your marketing and sales funnel or waterfall, as well as rules for tracking repeat or non-linear buyer stage transitions.
GTM motions.
Track touchpoints and performance for different business units, account segments, order types (such as acquisition and cross-sell), or regions with one or multiple currencies.
style
XL spacing, two up, grid-width-12, xxxl-gap
layout
1 | 1
Learn more
Pre-built models
Use multiple
pre-built models
, each optimized for different use cases. This eliminates the need to choose a model because Marketo Measure runs and updates all models simultaneously.
Full path.
Consider every touchpoint — from first touch to the closed/won — in this multi-touch model to measure end-to-end performance.
Partial funnel.
Use U-shaped models to understand what drives lead creation and W-shaped models to determine lead and opportunity creation drivers. Both are multi-touch and let you focus on the most effective tactics.
Single-touch.
Use the first-touch and lead creation models to quickly isolate the single touchpoint that most closely precedes conversion points.
Custom modeling
Create custom attribution models to account for the unique dynamics of your business and buyers, providing higher precision.
Stage choice.
Select what funnel stages to include in the model.
Weightings selection.
Dial in stage weightings just where you want them.
AI and machine learning recommendations.
Choose stages and weightings based wholly or partly on guidance from Adobe-powered AI and machine learning.
Attribution AI
Navigate the complexity of B2B buying and selling with AI. AI can eliminate assumptions and biases inherent in rules-based attribution, including the need to set standard weights for each stage’s importance to conversion.
Incremental scoring.
Let AI identify and remove baseline effects on conversion — including general brand value and untracked engagement — to get a more accurate view of performance.
Flexible conversion events.
Perform attribution for revenue creation, or any intermediate stage conversion, to focus on any area of the funnel.
Multiple AI models.
Create AI models that can be trained separately for different segments or go-to-market motions — such as acquisition and upsell — to gain targeted insight.
Advanced attribution modeling
With large buying groups and long buying cycles, it often takes more than 100 online and offline touchpoints to win a single B2B deal. Determining which touchpoints matter most is critical, but also difficult. Marketo Measure provides the sophisticated, yet easy-to-use modeling needed to separate the signal from the noise.
style
xl spacing, two up, grid-width-12, xxxl-gap
background
#FAFAFA
layout
1|1
Learn more about Attribution AI.
Enterprise-wide insight
Advanced attribution lets you determine the tactics that are driving progression, pipeline, and revenue. With Marketo Measure, you can use a broad range of reporting and data sharing options to deliver valuable attribution insights to teams across the organization.
Role-specific reporting
Share insights at a high or granular level into progression, pipeline, and revenue attribution and return on investment for executive roles, functional marketers, operations teams, and analysts.
CMOs.
Use insights supported by actual buyer engagement to articulate the financial impact of your marketing and demonstrate data-driven decision-making to earn trust and budget.
Campaigns, channels, and content.
Get the insights you need to understand what works best across and within the tactics you’re responsible for, whether you’re handling campaigns, paid media, or other aspects of go-to-market engagement.
Marketing ops and analysts.
Access reports that let you view and manage the entire funnel and the attribution process.
Pre-built dashboards
Leverage a rich set of dashboards and report templates out of the box based on your most frequently used insights.
In-app dashboards.
Take advantage of a range of filterable dashboards for topics ranging from revenue attribution and ROI to which tactics are driving lead and opportunity progression velocity.
BI report templates.
Do your reporting in a business intelligence (BI) tool with modifiable report templates that simultaneously unlock key insights and serve as practical examples of how to query Marketo Measure data.
CRM report templates.
Send results data to your CRM so you can take advantage of prebuilt reports there or build your own.
Data exploration and sharing
Get direct access to detailed touchpoint and results data to do ad hoc analyses or share data with other systems as part of your unique marketing assessment or planning process.
Marketo Measure data warehouse.
Use all the data at your fingertips for analysis or sharing.
Ad hoc analysis.
Leverage your favorite BI tool to create custom reports and visualizations.
Data sharing.
Plug Marketo Measure input or output data into other datasets, data warehouses, or platforms.
style
XL spacing, two up, grid-width-12, xxxl-gap
layout
1|1
linear-gradient(23deg, rgba(239,250,252,1) 0%, rgba(202,238,251,1) 46%)
Find out why Adobe was recognized as the most notable vendor in the marketing attribution space.
Read report | Read the gartner report
Powering marketing budget optimization for the world’s biggest brands.
style
grid width 6
Background
#F5F5F5
Experienced a
2.8x revenue increase
and a
24x pipeline increase.
Achieved a
16:1 revenue-to-spend ratio
via attribution optimization.
Reached a
2x return on marketing investment.
Increased website traffic by
600%.
style
xl spacing, four up
background
#F5F5F5
Learn more about Marketo Measure.
Content as a Service v3 - Marketo Measure - Thursday, January 16, 2025 at 16:31
title
Get AI-powered B2B marketing attribution and unleash growth.
CardDescription
Measure campaign, channel, and content impact on conversions and revenue using the intelligent tools inside Adobe Marketo Measure.
cardDate
2024-09-17
CardImageAltText
Total attributed revenue broken into revenue by channel
cardImage
primaryTag
caas:content-type/product-page
Tags
caas:content-type/product-page, caas:products/marketo-engage-bizible
Maximize your marketing budget with precision.
Maximize your marketing budget with precision.
Complete B2B marketing attribution — powered by AI.
Complete B2B marketing attribution — powered by AI.
Every-touch data aggregation
Every-touch data aggregation
Omnichannel aggregation
Omnichannel aggregation
Campaign and content associations
Campaign and content associations
Flexible data framework
Flexible data framework
Pre-built models
Pre-built models
pre-built models
pre-built models
Custom modeling
Custom modeling
Attribution AI
Attribution AI
Advanced attribution modeling
Advanced attribution modeling
Enterprise-wide insight
Enterprise-wide insight
Role-specific reporting
Role-specific reporting
Pre-built dashboards
Pre-built dashboards
Data exploration and sharing
Data exploration and sharing
Find out why Adobe was recognized as the most notable vendor in the marketing attribution space.
Find out why Adobe was recognized as the most notable vendor in the marketing attribution space.
Read report
Read report
Powering marketing budget optimization for the world’s biggest brands.
Powering marketing budget optimization for the world’s biggest brands.
28x revenue increase
28x revenue increase
24x pipeline increase.
24x pipeline increase.
16:1 revenue-to-spend ratio
16:1 revenue-to-spend ratio
2x return on marketing investment.
2x return on marketing investment.
600%.
600%.
Learn more about Marketo Measure.
Learn more about Marketo Measure.
Let's talk about what Adobe Marketo Measure can do for your business.
Let's talk about what Adobe Marketo Measure can do for your business.
Get started
Get started
Sub-policy 2
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/privacy/:
Adobe Privacy Policy
Last updated: June 18, 2024
The Adobe Privacy Policy describes the privacy practices of Adobe’s Services and Software (as defined in our General
Terms of Use)
and anywhere we display or reference this policy.
If you are a resident of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Inc. (Adobe U.S.) and the laws of California and the United States apply.
If you reside outside of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Systems Software Ireland Limited (Adobe Ireland), which is the controller with regard to your personal information collected by Adobe, and the laws of Ireland apply.
Please note that in order to use our Services and Software, you acknowledge that Adobe will transfer your personal information across national borders and to other countries where Adobe and its partners and providers operate, including the United States. The privacy protections and rights of authorities to access your information in these countries may not be equivalent to those in your country. We will only transfer your personal information to these countries where permitted to do so by law and we will take steps intended to ensure that your personal information continues to receive appropriate protections. For more information, please see the section “
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
”
If the content or information that you store in Adobe Services and Software contains personal information of other individuals, you must be legally permitted to disclose the personal information to Adobe.
Summary of Key Points
At Adobe we take data privacy seriously. We believe in transparency so you can control your data and make informed choices about how it is used. We are here to support and protect your privacy decisions wherever you use our products and services. Adobe prioritizes your control over the data you store in the cloud in the following ways:
This policy explains when we process personal information for our legitimate interests. You can ask us to stop processing this information.
Learn more about your rights and how you can exercise them.
This policy also explains when we will first get your consent before processing your personal information, including when doing so is required by law.
We use your personal information to enable you to register with Adobe and to provide you with our Services and Software, and other products or services that you request.
We provide interactive features that engage with social media sites, such as Facebook. If you use these features, these sites will send us personal information about you.
We use cookies and other technologies to track the use of our Services and Software. To learn about opportunities to choose not to allow cookies, click
here
. If you are using our website in a browser, this information is also available in our
Cookies Policy
.
There are several places within Adobe’s Services and Software that allow you to post comments, upload pictures, or submit content which will be publicly available where you choose to participate in these activities. We also disclose personal information to other companies in the Adobe family and with advertising and sales partners consistent with your choices. We also disclose information with third parties we engage to process personal information on our behalf or when such sharing is required by law, or in certain other situations.
We transfer your personal information to the US and other countries, which may be outside the country in which you live. We use government-approved contractual clauses such as European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses to help protect your personal information.
What does this privacy policy cover?
What information does Adobe collect about me?
How does Adobe use the information it collects about me, and what are the legal bases for these uses?
Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?
Is my personal information displayed anywhere within Adobe's apps or websites?
Is my personal information secure?
Where does Adobe store my personal information?
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
What rights do I have regarding my personal information and how can I exercise these?
What rights do I have in my state?
Withdrawing consent or otherwise objecting to direct marketing
What information is collected by companies using Adobe Experience Cloud solutions?
How long does Adobe retain my information?
Can children use Adobe websites and apps?
Will this privacy policy change?
Who can I contact with questions or concerns?
What does this privacy policy cover?
This privacy policy describes how Adobe (also referred to as "we," "us" or "our") will make use of your information in the context of:
Adobe websites; web-based services such as Behance; and web-based aspects of the Creative Cloud, Document Cloud and Experience Cloud (together referred to as "websites");
Services that display or include a reference to this policy;
Adobe’s marketing, sales, and advertising practices; and
The privacy practices of previously acquired companies, unless otherwise noted here.
Please note that websites and apps provided by some companies acquired by Adobe may operate under their own privacy policies until their privacy practices are integrated with Adobe's privacy practices. For a current list of these companies, click
here
. Additional privacy-related information for certain Adobe Services and Software can be found in the table below:
Adobe® Digital Editions
Acrobat Sign
Adobe Stock
Adobe Fonts
Flash® Player
Adobe Express Local Ambassador Program
Acrobat
Please also see the
Adobe Terms of Use
and any additional Terms of Use or
Product License Agreements
that may apply to the Services and Software you are using.
What information does Adobe collect about me?
Adobe ID, registration, and customer support
When you register to use an Adobe Service, create an Adobe ID, purchase a license to our Services and Software, or contact us for support or other offerings, Adobe collects information that identifies you. This includes:
Identifiers and contact information, such as:
Name;
Email address;
Telephone number;
Postal or Physical Address;
Country;
Commercial and transaction information, such as:
Payment/billing information (where an app or website is 'paid for');
Licenses purchased;
Eligibility information (e.g., student or teacher identification for student and teacher editions of apps);
Content of and information provided through customer support and other communications (e.g., recorded customer and technical support calls and stored content of your correspondence with us via our website, chat features, phone and video calls, emails, and other channels);
Types of Services and Software of interest.
Professional, education or other demographic information, such as:
Date of birth;
Company or school name;
Title;
Occupation;
Job function;
Expertise;
Company details, such as the size, industry, and other information about the company where a user may work (when the user has provided the company name);
Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as:
IP address;
Browser;
Mobile Device ID;
Browser extensions connected to your Adobe accounts.
Inferred Information
To help keep our databases current and to provide you the most relevant content and experiences, we may infer or generate information based on the information we collect or combine information provided by you with information from third party sources, in accordance with applicable law. For example, the size, industry, and other information about the company you work for (where you have provided company name) will be obtained from sources including, professional networking sites and information service providers. We may also infer, generate, or collect and receive information from third parties, including partners, and from publicly accessible sources, for purposes that include to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraudulent, deceptive or illegal activity, misuse of our Services and Software, security or technical issues, as well as to protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Adobe and our employees, our users, children, or the public.
Adobe Services and Software
We collect information you provide to us (e.g., when you access and use our Services and Software) or permit us to collect (e.g., as part of a third-party integration). We also collect or generate information about how you access and use our Services and Software, including when you use a desktop or mobile app feature that takes you online (such as a photo syncing feature). Depending on the Services and Software you access and use, this information may be associated with your device or browser or it may be associated with your Adobe account or content. It includes:
Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as:
IP address;
Browser and device information, including browser and device type, settings, unique identifiers, version, language settings, and configuration;
Webpage that led you to an Adobe website;
Search terms entered into a search engine which led you to an Adobe website;
Use and navigation of Services and Software, including how you interact with Adobe websites (collected through cookies and similar technologies, or by Adobe servers when you are logged into the app or website);
Analysis of your use and navigation of the Services and Software;
Analysis of your content subject to your opt-out and consent rights.
Professional, Education or other demographic information, such as:
Profile information (e.g., account profile, public profile, Behance profile).
Commercial and transaction information, such as:
Content that includes personal information which is sent or received using an online feature of Adobe Services and Software, or which is stored on Adobe servers, such as documents, photos, videos, activity logs, direct feedback from you, metadata about your content, user generated requests such as search terms, prompts (e.g., text, images, videos, audio, etc.), inquiries, feedback, and other information you may disclose when you access or use our Services and Software as well as any information the Services and Software returns in response to such requests.
Sensitive personal information, such as:
Biometric identifiers or information as defined under US laws (e.g., faceprints and voiceprints from your user Content, as defined in the
Adobe General Terms of Use
) and precise geolocation. Where required by law, we will seek any required permissions from you prior to any such collection. See the "Adobe acting on your behalf" and "How we analyze your content to deliver features requested by you" sections below for more information.
The following links provide further information on:
Adobe product improvement program
;
Usage Data FAQ: Creative Cloud and Document Cloud Apps
Experience Cloud usage information FAQ
;
Adobe Genuine Software
Your
privacy choices
regarding how we use this information;
Adobe products and services licensed by
educational institutions
;
How Adobe uses
cookies and similar technologies
; and
How Adobe
analyzes your content
using techniques such as machine learning in order to improve our Services and Software, and how to
opt out
of this.
Adobe Software activation and automatic updates
When you activate your Adobe Software or when you install updates to the Software, we collect analytics or other electronic network activity information, such as: your device (manufacturer, model, IP address);
the Adobe Software (version, date of activation, successful and unsuccessful updates);
your product serial number (e.g., where this is required before you can start using your product).
You can learn more about app activation
here
.
Adobe emails
Emails we send you may include a technology (called a
web beacon
) that collects Analytics or other electronic network activity, such as whether you have received or opened the email, or clicked a link in the email. If you do not want us to collect this information, you can
opt out of receiving Adobe marketing emails
.
Adobe online advertising
Adobe advertises online in a variety of ways, including displaying Adobe ads to you on other companies' websites and apps and on social media platforms, such as Facebook and LinkedIn. Adobe websites use cookies, pixels, and similar technologies provided by our own company (
Adobe Experience Cloud
) and other companies that allow us to gather additional information to measure and improve the effectiveness of our advertising. We collect Analytics or other electronic network activity information such as:
Which ads are displayed;
Which ads are clicked on; and
Where the ad was displayed.
Learn more about
Adobe’s advertising practices
.
Buttons, tools, and content from other companies
Adobe Services and Software may include buttons, tools, or content that link to other companies’ services (for example, a Facebook "Like" button). We may collect information about your use of these features, such as content “liked” and address information in Google Maps. In addition, when you see or interact with these buttons, tools, or content, or view an Adobe web page or app containing them, some information from your browser may automatically be sent to the other company. Please read that company’s privacy policy for more information.
Adobe websites may implement Google reCAPTCHA Enterprise to help prevent spam and abuse. reCAPTCHA Enterprise collects hardware and software information, such as device and application data, and sends it to Google for purposes of providing, maintaining, and improving reCAPTCHA Enterprise and for general security purposes. Your use of reCAPTCHA Enterprise is subject to Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
Adobe social networking pages and social sign-on services
You can sign into some Adobe Services and Software using a social networking account, such as a Facebook account. Where you give appropriate permissions, we will receive contact and identifier information about you from your social networking account, such as name, country, and basic demographic information.
Adobe has its own pages on many social networking sites (for example, the Adobe® Photoshop® team’s Facebook page). We will collect information which you have made publicly available on your social networking account, such as name and interests in our products and services, when you interact with our social networking pages. The social networking sites may provide statistics and insights to Adobe which help us understand the types of actions that people take on our pages. Where applicable, Adobe and the social media site(s) have entered into an arrangement which determines our respective responsibilities.
You can learn more about Adobe’s practices with respect to social networking pages and account sign-on services
here
.
Adobe acting on your behalf
In certain instances, Adobe is acting only on your behalf for personal information collected and processed by our services (for example, for the address book contacts shared by users when entering recipient information). In such cases, Adobe is acting only on your instructions in order to facilitate the Service requested by you, and you will be responsible for the information shared. In these instances, we will inform you through in-app notifications or other in-time communications. If you submit any information relating to other people to us or to our service providers in connection with your use of Adobe apps or websites, you represent that you have the authority to do so and to permit us to use the information in accordance with this policy.
How we process your content to deliver features requested by you
Adobe offers certain features that let you edit and organize your photographs, videos, and other types of content using characteristics like face and voice (e.g., you can group similar faces, places, and image characteristics within your collection), and such characteristics may be considered biometric identifiers or biometric information under certain US laws or other applicable privacy laws. When you choose to use these features, Adobe is acting only on your instructions in order to facilitate the service requested by you. These features are off by default and, should you choose to enable them, you can always disable these features. Where we process biometric identifiers or biometric information to deliver a feature requested by you, we delete this information once you turn off the feature, unless otherwise specified in the Software or Services.
Visiting our Physical Offices
When you visit an Adobe office, we will collect Identifiers and Contact information such as your name, company name, and email address; and Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information including facial images and voice information such as from CCTV video or voice recordings and photos.
How does Adobe use the information it collects about you, and what are the legal bases for these uses?
Adobe uses the information we collect about you for the following purposes:
To fulfill a contract, or take steps linked to a contract: this is relevant where you register to use an Adobe app or website (whether paid, or as a free trial). This includes:
Providing you with the Adobe Services and Software for which you have registered, and any other services or products that you have requested;
Administering product or platform skill/knowledge courses and other content, including testing and certifications (as applicable);
Verifying your identity;
Processing payments;
Sending you necessary communications (for example, related to payments or expiration of your subscription); and
Providing customer service or support.
As required by Adobe to conduct our business and pursue our legitimate interests:
Analyzing your
content
and its characteristics using automated techniques, in the following circumstances:
Operational Use
. Our Services and Software will access your content stored locally on your device (“Local Content”) and content that you have uploaded to our servers or create using our cloud-based Services (“
Cloud Content
”), to enable the normal running of the Services and Software.
Content Analytics with Cloud Content
. Subject to your opt-out rights, including those described
here
, we may perform analytics with Cloud Content to help us understand how our users are using our Services and Software to allow us to improve your Services and Software experience, provide recommendations to you, and customize your experience. Insights from Content Analytics may be used to inform our marketing to you, subject to your opt-out rights regarding our marketing.
Analyzing your
content
and its characteristics using automated techniques or with human review, in the following circumstances:
Illegal and Abusive Cloud Content
. Cloud Content may be automatically scanned to ensure we are not hosting illegal or abusive content, like Child Sexual Abuse Material. Human review may occur when your Cloud Content is flagged or reported as illegal or abusive.
Public and Shared Cloud Content
. All public and shared Cloud Content is subject to review for intellectual property issues and safety issues (for example, violence and nudity). If you choose to share your Cloud Content with others using our Software and Services, we may automatically review this shared Cloud Content to flag abusive behavior (such as spam or phishing). When you make your Cloud Content publicly available, additional human review may occur.
Providing you with the Adobe Services and Software for which you have registered and any other products and services you have requested;
Analyzing your use and measuring effectiveness of our Services and Software, including recordings, to better understand how they are being used so we can improve them and engage and retain users;
Sending you information about Adobe products and services, special offers and similar information, and sharing your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes, where your consent is not required;
Analyzing your use and navigation of our Services and Software, your profile information, your interaction with our communications (excluding your content), to:
Detect and prevent fraudulent, deceptive, or, illegal activity, or misuse of our Services and Software;
Improve our Services and Software, and the user experience, subject to your opt-out and consent rights, including those described here; and
Tailor and customize the Services and Software through marketing communications (
learn more
)
Diagnosing problems in our Services and Software;
Conducting surveys and market research about our customers, their interests, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and customer satisfaction (unless we need consent to undertake such surveys, in which case we will only do this with your permission);
Investigating and responding to any comments or complaints that you may send us;
Checking the validity of the sort code, account number and card number you submit if you use a credit or debit card for payment, in order to prevent payment fraud or other illegal or deceptive payment practices (we use third parties for this – see “Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?” below);
Sharing account information registered under a business email address with employers for account migration purposes;
Combining with other data we may have about how you interacted with our products and services when logged out or logged in, in order to provide a more seamless experience, show you the most relevant content and services, and for marketing purposes, with your consent where required;
If we merge with or are acquired by another company, sell an Adobe website, app, or business unit, or if all or a substantial portion of our assets are acquired by another company, your information will likely be disclosed to the prospective purchaser, our advisers and any other prospective purchaser's advisers and will be one of the assets that is transferred to the new owner; and
In connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory and investigative purposes as necessary (including disclosure of information in connection with government agency requests, legal process or litigation).
Where we process your information based on legitimate interests, you can object to this processing in certain circumstances. In such cases, we will cease processing information unless we have compelling legitimate grounds to continue processing or where it is needed for legal reasons.
If legitimate interest is not an available legal basis in a particular jurisdiction, we will engage in the processing activities described above on a legal basis that is available in that particular jurisdiction.
Where required,
when you give Adobe your consent
or otherwise consistent with your choices:
Sending you information about Adobe products and services, special offers and similar information, and sharing your information with third parties for their own marketing purposes;
Placing cookies and using similar technologies in our Services and Software and in email communications, in accordance with our
Cookies Policy
and the information provided to you when those technologies are used;
Accessing information stored on your device for the following operational uses:
Information relating to your use of, and engagement with, Services and Software related to crash reports in order to fix the underlying problem causing the crash;
Information which you allow us to receive through device-based settings (e.g., photos, location and camera) in order to provide certain functionality within our Services and Software;
Analyzing your use and navigation of the Services and Software or your content and its characteristics using automated techniques or human review in order to:
Detect and prevent fraudulent, deceptive, or illegal activity or misuse of the Services and Software;
Improve our services and the user experience, such as through the Adobe Product Improvement Program as described
here
; and
Respond to your request (e.g., customer service).
Allowing you to participate in sweepstakes, contests, and similar promotions and to administer these activities.
On other occasions where we ask you for consent, we will use the information for the purposes which we explain at that time. Where we rely on consent to process information, you can withdraw your consent to such activities at any time.
For legal reasons:
Responding to requests by government or law enforcement authorities conducting an investigation.
Using or disclosing information as reasonably necessary to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, potential deceptive or illegal activities, misuse of Services and Software, or technical issues and software piracy (e.g., to confirm that software is genuine and properly licensed), helping to protect you as well as Adobe.
Where this processing and these disclosures are not strictly required by law, Adobe may rely on its legitimate interests, where available, and those of third parties described above.
Does Adobe disclose my personal information to others?
Disclosing to other Data Controllers
We will disclose your personal information within the Adobe family of companies for the purposes identified above (see a list of
Adobe entities
and our
acquired companies
).
We will also disclose your personal information with other third-party data controllers with your consent (where necessary) or to provide any product or service you have requested (e.g., third-party integrations). The types of third parties your information may be disclosed to include: our resellers and other sales and advertising partners, retailers, advertisers, ad agencies, advertising networks and platforms, information service providers, fraud monitoring and prevention providers, and publishers. In some cases, in order to show you more relevant ads, we disclose with social media platforms and other advertising partners, information about actions you take on our websites and apps, such as which pages you visit and which ads you saw. These parties may be joint controllers for this processing. More information is available
here
.
Third-party data controllers may also use Adobe products and services to collect and process your personal information. If you are using an email address that is associated with a business domain (e.g.,
yourname@businessname.com
) to access Adobe's Services and Software, or if you were invited to use the Services and Software by a business, we may provide your personal information to that business.
Disclosing for Fraud Prevention, Safety and Security Purposes
We will disclose personal information to companies that help us run our business to detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, deception, illegal activity, misuse of Adobe Services and Software, and security or technical issues.
Additionally, we will disclose personal information to companies, organizations, government authorities, or individuals outside of Adobe if we have a good-faith belief that access, use, preservation or disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to detect, prevent, or protect against such fraudulent, deceptive, or illegal activity, misuse of our Services and Software, or security or technical issues, or where it is reasonably necessary to protect from harm the rights, property or safety of Adobe and our employees, our users, children, or the public as required or permitted by law.
Disclosing to Data Processors
We will also disclose your personal information to companies that help us run our business by processing personal information on behalf of Adobe for the purposes identified above. Such companies (including those that may record or store communications) include providers of customer support services, chatbots, session replay partners who provide services which recreate a web or app session showing meaningful insight into a visitor’s experience, providers of analytics technologies that record and analyze your interaction with our websites to help us improve your experience, providers of artificial intelligence technologies that record and analyze your content or communications, payment processing services, fraud monitoring and prevention, detecting and preventing deceptive or illegal activity or misuse of our Services and Software, email, social media, and other marketing platforms and service providers, and hosting services. We require these companies to protect your personal information consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Other Information Disclosure
Adobe may also disclose your personal information:
When you agree to the disclosure;
When we have a good faith belief that we are required to provide information in response to a subpoena, court order, or other applicable law or legal process (
learn more
), or to respond to an emergency involving the danger of death or serious bodily harm;
If we merge with or are acquired by another company, sell an Adobe website, app, or business unit, or if all or a substantial portion of our assets are acquired by another company, your information will likely be disclosed to the prospective purchaser, our advisers and any prospective purchaser's advisers and will be one of the assets that is transferred to the new owner.
We may disclose or publish aggregate information that doesn’t specifically identify you, such as statistical information about visitors to our websites or statistical information about how customers
use the Adobe Experience Cloud
.
Is my personal information displayed anywhere on Adobe’s websites or applications?
There are several places within Adobe’s Services and Software that allow you to post comments, upload pictures, participate in message boards or chats, engage with blogs, share technical information, or submit other content for others to see. Sometimes you can limit who can see what you share, but there are some places where what you share can be seen by the general public or other users of the service. Such information can appear in search engine results or through other publicly available platforms and can be “crawled” or searched by third parties. For example, when users post content on message boards, online chats, blogs, and Community Forums, the information posted by the user will become public. Some online content may remain accessible publicly even after Adobe fulfils a request to delete the poster’s personal information.
Please be careful when you share your personal information. Do not share anything you wouldn’t want publicly known unless you are sure you are posting it within an app or website that allows you to control who sees what you post. Please note that when you post messages on certain user forums on our websites and app, your email address or name and/or profile photo may be included and displayed with your message. You can find more information about managing your public profile
here
. To remove content you have shared on our Services and Software, please use the same feature you used to share the content. If another user invites you to participate in shared viewing, editing, or commenting of content, you may be able to delete your contributions, but usually the user who invited you has full control. If you have questions or concerns about this, please
contact us
.
Is my personal information secure?
We work hard to protect your personal information. We employ administrative, technical, and physical security controls where appropriate, such as encryption, 2-step verification, and appropriate contractual confidentiality obligations for employees and contractors.
Where does Adobe store my personal information?
Your personal information and files are stored on Adobe’s servers and the servers of companies we engage to provide services to us.
Does Adobe transfer my personal information across national borders?
The main locations where we process your personal information are the US and India, but we also transfer personal information to all other countries in which Adobe or its affiliates, providers, and partners operate. We carry out these transfers in compliance with applicable laws – for example, by putting data transfer agreements in place to help protect your personal information.
If you reside outside of North America, your relationship is with Adobe Ireland. Where Adobe Ireland transfers your personal information to a country which is not within the EEA and is not subject to an adequacy decision by the EU Commission, we rely on one or more of the following legal mechanisms: European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses and/or your consent in certain circumstances. A copy of the relevant mechanism can be provided for your review upon request, using the contact details provided at the end of this Privacy Policy. For more information about how Adobe Ireland transfers European personal information, please see
Cross-border data transfers.
Adobe and its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc. comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Adobe has also certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (as does its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc.). Adobe has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF (as does its U.S. subsidiaries Marketo Inc, Magento (X-commerce, Inc) and Workfront Inc.). If there is any conflict between the terms in this policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. Adobe’s commitments under the Data Privacy Framework are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
As set out above Adobe uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in providing our services to our users and business customers. These third parties may access, process, or store personal data in the course of providing their services. Adobe maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our Data Privacy Framework obligations, including the onward transfer provisions, and Adobe remains liable if they fail to meet those obligations and Adobe is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage).
The information above applies to Adobe users who are consumers. More information is available for our business customers that want to learn more about
Cross-border data transfers
.
What rights do I have regarding my personal information and how can I exercise these rights?
When provided for by applicable law, you have the right to ask us for a copy of your personal information; to correct, delete or restrict (stop any active) processing of your personal information; and to obtain the personal information you provide to us for a contract or with your consent in a structured, machine readable format, and to ask us to share (port) this information to another controller. You may be entitled to additional rights based on applicable data privacy laws in your jurisdiction.
In addition, you can object to the processing of your personal information in some circumstances (such as where we are using the information for direct marketing).
These rights may be limited, for example, if fulfilling your request would reveal personal information about another person, or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law to keep or which we need to defend claims against us. In addition, Adobe websites recognize the Global Privacy Control available in some web browsers. If your browser is configured to send this signal, Adobe will opt you out of Adobe’s use of advertising cookies on that browser. You can learn more about Adobe’s
advertising practices
and your privacy choices
here
.
To exercise any of these rights (including deactivating your Adobe ID account), you can get in touch with us – or our data protection officer – using the details set out below. Additionally, many of our Services and Software allow you to edit your personal information by accessing the "
my account
," "my profile," or a similar feature of the service you are using. Likewise, you can delete files or photos you have stored in our Services and Software by logging in and using the deletion functions that are available.
If you have unresolved concerns, you have the right to report them to your local privacy regulator or data protection authority and, where applicable, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with Adobe Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission.
When you are asked to provide personal information, you may decline. And you may use web browser or operating system controls to prevent certain types of automatic data collection. But if you choose not to provide or allow information that is necessary for certain services or features, those services or features may not be available or fully functional. For example, to register with Adobe, to create an Adobe ID, and to use some Adobe Services and Software, the provision of some information is mandatory: if relevant information is not provided, then we will not be able to administer an Adobe account to you, or provide you with the Services and Software requested. Other optional information, if not provided, may impact our ability to provide a personalized experience or tailored content or offerings.
What rights do I have in my state?
In addition to the rights above, see
Additional US State Privacy Rights
for more information.
Withdrawing consent or otherwise objecting to direct marketing
The Adobe family of companies (see list of
Adobe entities
and our
acquired companies
) and companies we hire to help market our Services and Software on our behalf may use your information to provide you with information and offers related to Adobe.
Where we rely on your consent, you will always be able to withdraw that consent, although we may have other legal grounds for processing your information for other purposes, such as those set out above. In some cases, we are able to send you direct marketing without your consent, where we rely on our legitimate interests. You have an absolute right to opt-out of direct marketing, or profiling we carry out for direct marketing, at any time by:
updating your preferences in your Adobe ID profile;
updating your preferences in your specific website or app accounts;
clicking the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our marketing emails; or
contacting us using the details provided at the end of this privacy policy.
Click
here
for further information on your choices regarding our marketing practices.
What information is collected by companies using Adobe Experience Cloud solutions?
Adobe Experience Cloud solutions help our business customers personalize and improve the performance of their websites, apps, and marketing messages. For example, these customers may use Adobe Experience Cloud solutions to collect and analyze information about how individuals use their websites (
learn more
). The information collected is stored in our services on behalf of and for use by these business customers.
How long does Adobe retain my information?
When you register for an account and create an Adobe ID, we process and keep most personal information we process on your behalf for as long as you are an active user of our Services and Software. We delete certain personal information we collect about you when we no longer have a business reason to retain it. Additionally, there is some personal information we need to retain even after you close your account to comply with business and legal requirements, such as personal information related to our contract and business transactions with you, which we retain for ten years after your last interaction with us.
Where we process personal information for marketing purposes or with your consent, we process the information until you ask us to stop and for a short period after this (to allow us to implement your requests). We also keep a permanent record of the fact that you have asked us not to send you direct marketing or to process your information so that we can respect your request in the future.
Can children use Adobe websites and apps?
Adobe Services and Software are not intended for children under the age of 13, except in limited situations where certain products, including Adobe Express and Creative Cloud All Apps, may be available to children for educational purposes under the direct supervision of a teacher. In these circumstances, Adobe is authorized to collect student data by the participating school, which has obtained appropriate consent, if needed.
Adobe’s Direct COPPA Notice
provides more information about the collection and use of student data.
All other Adobe Services and Software are not intended for use by children and certain products specifically prohibit users who are under a certain age. If you do not meet applicable age requirements, please do not use those Services and Software. If you are age 13 or over and meet applicable age requirements to use certain Services and Software, Adobe makes available
Privacy for Younger Users
page to provide information about our privacy practices in an age-appropriate format.
Will this privacy policy change?
Occasionally, we may update this privacy policy (or other documents in the Adobe Privacy Center) to allow Adobe to accommodate new technologies, industry practices, regulatory requirements or for other purposes. If we do, we will change the "last updated" date at the top of this policy and the revised policy will be posted to this page so that you are aware of the information we collect, how we use it, and under what circumstances we may disclose it. We encourage you to periodically review the
Adobe Privacy Center
for the latest information on our privacy practices. Under certain circumstances (for example with certain material changes or where it is required by applicable privacy laws) we will provide notice to you of these changes and, where required by applicable law, we will obtain your consent. Notice may be by email to you, by posting a notice of such changes on our Services and Software, or by other means consistent with applicable law.
Who can I contact with questions or concerns?
If you have a privacy question, concern, or request, please fill out a
privacy inquiry form
.
If you are outside North America, you can also get in touch with Adobe Ireland's data protection officer at
DPO@Adobe.com
or by postal mail at 4-6 Riverwalk, Citywest Business Park, Dublin 24, Ireland.
For practices that are covered by our
PRP Certification
, if you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you believe Adobe maintains your personal data in one of the services within the scope of our Data Privacy Framework certification, you may direct any inquiries or complaints concerning our Data Privacy Framework compliance by filling in our privacy inquiry form. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://www.ana.net/content/show/id/accountability-dpf-consumers
. If neither Adobe nor our dispute resolution provider resolves your complaint, you may have the possibility to engage in binding arbitration through the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see Annex I of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles.
This Adobe site doesn't match your location
Based on your location, we think you may prefer the Ireland website, where you'll get regional content, offerings, and pricing.
Ireland
United States
Sub-policy 3
https://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy/:

Sub-policy 4
https://www.greenhouse.io/privacy-policy:
Skip to Content
Close mobile sub-navigation
Greenhouse Home Link
Open menu for
Platform
Platform
The all-together hiring platform
Solutions
Talent sourcing
Candidate experience
Scalable workflows
Interviewing & decision-making
Onboarding
Reporting & insights
Integrations
Greenhouse for
Early-stage business
Scaling company
Modern enterprise
What’s new
Latest product features
Open menu for
Why Greenhouse
Why Greenhouse
How we compare
Return on your hiring investment
Your partner in success
Awards & accolades
Awards & accolades
Greenhouse named Best Software for Enterprise in 2024
Learn why Greenhouse is an award-winning enterprise software for companies like DoorDash, Betterment and MLB.
Learn more
Open menu for
Resources
Types
Blog
Guidance
Customer stories
Hiring glossary
Talent Makers book
Topics
DE&I
Structured hiring
AI and automation
Hiring Maturity
Support
Learn Greenhouse
Get support
Developer resources
Open menu for
About
About
Company
Press & awards
Careers
People first
People first
The future belongs to people-first companies
Today’s talent thinks differently about where and how they work, and winning companies are people-first companies. Here’s how to build a culture that connects.
Read the blog
Open menu for
Community
Community
Events & webinars
Open
Talent Makers
Newsletter
Partnerships
Webinar
Webinar
The great hiring debate
Join this webinar to hear from key hiring leaders on how to achieve business success through strategic, efficient and effective hiring practices.
Register now
Sign in
Request a demo
Toggle search form
Open mobile navigation
Legal
secondary menu
All documents
Privacy policy
Cookie notice
CCPA/CPRA for candidates
Master subscription agreement
Data processing addendum
Service level agreement
Subprocessors in use
Professional services addendum
Sourcing automation addendum
Scroll Subnavigation
Legal – Privacy policy
Privacy policy
Date last updated
: March 3, 2025
Introduction
Greenhouse Software, Inc. ("
Greenhouse
") respects your privacy and is committed to protecting it in accordance with applicable laws and using generally-accepted industry practices. This Privacy Policy explains who we are, how we collect, share, and use personal information about you, and how you can exercise your privacy rights. For purposes of this Privacy Policy, “
Personal Information
” means any information that is available to Greenhouse and that is protected explicitly by the European Union General Data Protection Regulation of 2016 (the “
EU GDPR
”); the EU GDPR as saved into United Kingdom law by virtue of section 3 of the United Kingdom’s European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 (the "
UK GDPR
"); and the California Consumer Protection Act “
CCPA
”), to the extent applicable.
If you have any questions or concerns about Greenhouse’s collection and use of your Personal Information, please contact us using the contact details provided below. If however, your questions or concerns are related to a Greenhouse customer’s collection and use of your Personal Information, please contact that customer directly.
Scope of this policy
Greenhouse is a leading provider of cloud-based software services that help companies manage and optimize their recruiting and hiring processes.
Greenhouse processes personal data in the following contexts:
1. As a processor on behalf of its customers for recruiting and onboarding purposes.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to Personal Information in this context. Our customers are the controllers of the Personal Information they collect through Greenhouse’s Services to manage their own recruiting and onboarding processes (
e.g.
, names, contact information, and other data collected as part of job applications), and each customer manages that Personal Information in accordance with its own privacy policies. Greenhouse’s privacy commitments to our customers are governed by a separate customer agreement that authorizes us to collect, process, and store Personal Information on their behalf, as a processor under the EU GDPR and the UK GDPR, and a service provider under the CCPA. Greenhouse processes Personal Information relating to our customers’ employees and job applicants within our Services only according to our customers’ instructions (as defined in our customer agreements), and we have no direct relationship with the individuals whose Personal Information we process in connection with our customers’ use of our Services. For example, if you apply to a job posted on a career page of a Greenhouse customer, your Personal Information will be automatically processed by Greenhouse on behalf of that customer. However, the company you applied to is the data controller (or business, as that term is defined in the CCPA) with respect to your Personal Information, and you should contact that entity directly with any questions you may have regarding its privacy policies or data processing practices, or if you wish to modify or access your Personal Information, restrict its processing, or delete it from our Services. Greenhouse’s customer contracts require us to redirect any inquiries relating to the Personal Information we process on behalf of a customer back to that customer without taking any action on the request.
2. As a controller in a commercial context (
e.g.
, managing business relationships with customers and vendors).
3. As a controller in an employment context (
e.g.
, processing job applications for Greenhouse’s own hiring).
4. As a controller for the
My Greenhouse
service, where Personal Information is collected directly from job seekers who use the platform to apply for jobs or manage their job search. For more information on how Greenhouse processes your Personal Information in this context,
please see this section.
This Privacy Policy applies to Personal Information in contexts 2, 3, and 4.
Our websites, products and services are generally designed for businesses and their representatives. Outside of the My Greenhouse service, we do not offer products or services for use by individuals for their personal, family or household purposes. Accordingly, we treat all Personal Information we collect, other than the Personal Information provided by users of the My Greenhouse service, as pertaining to individuals in their capacities as business representatives and not as individual consumers.
Greenhouse is the controller of Personal Information that we collect directly from visitors to our marketing website,
www.greenhouse.io
(the “Website”); from our own job applicants; and from our customers and vendors to help us manage our business relationships with them. This Privacy Policy describes the type of Personal Information that Greenhouse collects; Greenhouse’s policies around the use, disclosure, and retention of that Personal Information; and the choices available to you regarding your rights in relation to your Personal Information generally.
Personal information we collect
Greenhouse may collect the following information, including Personal Information from and about you:
From your interaction with Sales, Marketing, and Customer Support
We collect Personal Information such as your name, company name, email address, phone number, and billing information when you request a demo of our Services, or request sales information or customer service.
Third-party sources
We may combine Personal Information we receive from you with personal information we obtain from other sources, such as:
Public sources
, such as government agencies, public records, social media platforms, and other publicly available sources.
Data providers
, such as information services and data licensors that provide other information, such as your business contact information.
Cookies, Scripts and Related Technologies
When you visit our website,
www.greenhouse.io
, we and our third-party service providers receive Personal Information that you may have provided, such as your IP address. The technologies we use to track your movements around our website include cookies, tracking scripts and pixels, and tagging technologies, which we may employ to understand your preferences, improve your experience on our website, etc. You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level. If you want to learn more about cookies, or how to control, disable, or delete them, please visit
aboutcookies.org
for detailed guidance.
Collection of Data by Advertisers
We may also use third parties to manage our advertising on other sites. Certain third-party partners may automatically collect information about your visits to this and other websites, your IP address, your ISP, the browser you use to visit our website (but not your name, address, e-mail address or telephone number). They do this by using cookies, pixel tags or other technologies. Information collected may be used, among other things, to deliver advertising targeted to your interests and to better understand the usage and visitation of our website and the other sites tracked by these third parties. This policy does not apply to, and we are not responsible for, cookies or pixel tags in third party ads, and we encourage you to check the privacy policies of advertisers and/or ad services to learn about their use of cookies and other technologies. If you would like more information about this practice and to know your choices about not having this information used by these companies, click here:
aboutads.info/choices
or
networkadvertising.org
.
How Greenhouse uses your personal information
We may use the information that we collect about you and from you, including Personal Information, for the following purposes:
To provide, operate, improve, and customize our Website
We seek to improve your experience with our Website. As a result, we will analyze data we collect about your use of the Website.
To communicate with you
If you request more information about our products, we will contact you using the information you provide us. We may also send you information about products and services that may be of interest to you, with your prior opt-in consent where required by applicable law.
To aggregate data
We may anonymize and/or aggregate data collected through our Website and to create statistics that may be used for any purpose, provided that such statistics do not identify any customers or individuals or contain any Personal Information.
To process your job application
If you apply to work at Greenhouse, Greenhouse will use the Personal Information provided in the context of your application for the purposes of processing and evaluating the application.
For marketing and advertising
We, our service providers, and our third-party advertising partners may collect and use your personal information for marketing and advertising purposes:
Direct marketing. We may send you direct marketing communications. You may opt-out of our marketing communications as described in the Opt-out of marketing section below.
Interest-based advertising. Our third-party advertising partners may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about your interaction (including the data described in the automatic data collection section above) with the Service, our communications and other online services over time, and use that information to serve online ads that they think will interest you. This is called interest-based advertising. We may also share information about our users with these companies to facilitate interest-based advertising to those or similar users on other online platforms. You can learn more about your choices for limiting interest-based advertising in the Your choices section of our
Cookie Notice
.
Comply with applicable laws, lawful requests, and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas or requests from government authorities;
Protect our, your or others’ rights, privacy, safety or property (including by making and defending legal claims);
Audit our internal processes for compliance with legal and contractual requirements or our internal policies;
Enforce the terms and conditions that govern the Service; and
Prevent, identify, investigate and deter fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft.
How Greenhouse may disclose or share your information
We do not sell or otherwise disclose Personal Information we collect about you, except as described in this Privacy Policy or as we disclose to you at the time this information is collected. As described in more detail below, we may share your Personal Information:
With our partners and third-party service providers. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the information only as necessary to perform services on behalf of Greenhouse (for example, to support the delivery of, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the security of our Website). We require these service providers by contract to safeguard the privacy and security of Personal Information that they process on our behalf;
To third-party advertising companies for the marketing and advertising purposes described above;
To any competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights, (iii) to protect your vital interests or those of any other person or (iv) for any of the compliance and protection purposes outlined above;
To professional advisors, such as lawyers, auditors, bankers and insurers, where necessary in the course of the professional services that they render to us;
To an acquirer, successor, or assignee as part of any merger, acquisition, debt financing, sale of assets, or similar transaction, or in the event of an insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership in which information is transferred to one or more third parties as one of our business assets, provided that we inform such third parties that they must use your Personal Information only for the purposes disclosed in this Privacy Policy; and
To any other person with your consent to the disclosure.
Your choices
Opt-out of marketing communications
You may opt-out of marketing-related emails by following the opt-out or unsubscribe instructions at the bottom of the email, or by contacting us. Please note that if you choose to opt-out of marketing-related emails, you may continue to receive service-related and other non-marketing emails.
Cookies
For information about cookies employed by the Service and how to control them, see our
Cookie Notice
.
Mobile location data
You can disable our access to your device’s precise geolocation in your mobile device settings.
Do Not Track
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to “Do Not Track” or similar signals. To find out more about “Do Not Track,” please visit
allaboutdnt.com
.
Declining to provide information
We need to collect Personal Information to provide certain marketing materials or other information that you may want. If you do not provide the information we identify as required or mandatory, we may not be able to provide those materials or information.
How Greenhouse secures your information
We care about the security of your Personal Information, and take steps including implementing appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure that your Personal Information is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your Personal Information.
International data transfers
Your Personal Information may be transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are resident. These countries may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
Specifically, our primary offices are located in the United States, and our third-party service providers and partners operate around the world. This means that when we collect your Personal Information, it may be processed in any of these countries.
Notice to European, Swiss and UK users
The information provided in this “Notice to European, Swiss, and UK Users” section applies only to individuals in the European Economic Area (the “EEA”), Switzerland, or the UK.
If you are a visitor from the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Information described above will depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Information from you only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Information to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Information from you or may otherwise need the Personal Information to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your personal information).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Information in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information, please contact us at privacy@greenhouse.io.
Data Protection Rights
As an EEA, Swiss, or UK data subject, you have the following data protection rights:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your Personal Information, you can do so at any time by contacting us at privacy@greenhouse.io.
If you wish to opt out of (i) the disclosure of your Personal Information to a third party, or (ii) the use of your Personal Information for a purpose materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by you, you can exercise these rights at any time by contacting us at privacy@greenhouse.io. In any event, unless Greenhouse has affirmative express consent from you, Greenhouse will not (i) disclose sensitive information (i.e., personal information specifying medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or information specifying the sex life of the individual), or (ii) use sensitive personal information for a purpose other than those for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by you through the exercise of opt-in-choice. Greenhouse will treat as sensitive any Personal Information received from a third party where the third party identifies and treats it as sensitive.
You can object to processing of your Personal Information, ask us to restrict processing of your Personal Information or request portability of your Personal Information. Again, you can exercise these rights by contacting us at privacy@greenhouse.io.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your Personal Information with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your Personal Information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
How long Greenhouse retains your personal information
We retain Personal Information we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to provide you with a service you have requested or to comply with applicable legal, tax or accounting requirements).
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your Personal Information, we will either delete or anonymize it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your Personal Information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your Personal Information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
Children’s privacy
We do not knowingly collect, maintain, or use Personal Information from children under 13 years of age, and no part of our website is directed to children under the age of 13. If you learn that your child has provided us with Personal Information without your consent, you may alert us at privacy@greenhouse.io. If we learn that we have collected any Personal Information from children under 13, we will promptly take steps to delete such information and terminate the child’s account.
Third-party certifications: Data Privacy Framework
Greenhouse complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Greenhouse has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Greenhouse has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Greenhouse commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal data. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Greenhouse at:
privacy@greenhouse.io
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Greenhouse further commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. Complaints may be submitted to the EU DPAs, the UK ICO, and/or the FDPIC, as appropriate, at no cost to you.
Please note that if your complaint is not resolved through these methods above, a binding arbitration option may be available under limited circumstances. Additional information can be found here:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2
. Additionally, Greenhouse is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC), and the FTC has jurisdiction over Greenhouse’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
With regard to onward transfers of personal data to third parties, Greenhouse is responsible for ensuring that the third parties comply with applicable data protection principles, including ensuring that the third parties do not process such personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles.
My Greenhouse
This “My Greenhouse” section is applicable only to users of the
My Greenhouse
service.
Personal Information We Collect
In addition to the categories of Personal Information already listed, Greenhouse collects the following categories information directly from users of the My Greenhouse service:
Resumes, cover letters, and other job application materials.
Contact details, such as email addresses and phone numbers.
Job preferences and search criteria.
How Greenhouse Uses Your Personal Information
For users of the My Greenhouse service, we use your Personal Information to:
Facilitate job applications and connect you with potential employers.
Provide personalized job recommendations and search functionality.
Share your information with employers seeking candidates with your skills and background, as referenced in the My Greenhouse User Agreement.
Your Choices
Users of the My Greenhouse service who object to Greenhouse sharing or selling your Personal Information with potential employers should close their account.
Users of the My Greenhouse service in the European Economic Area (the “EEA”), Switzerland, or the UK may, alternately, opt out of sharing their Personal Information with potential employers by contacting us at
job-seeker-optout@greenhouse.io
and listing their name, email address, and country.
Interseller
This “Interseller” section is applicable only to Interseller, and excludes all other Greenhouse products and services, including, but not limited to, Greenhouse Recruiting, Greenhouse Onboarding and Greenhouse Sourcing Automation. For information on the privacy practices related to Interseller, please refer to the
Interseller privacy page
and the
Interseller privacy ccpa page
.
2023 Data Broker Requests
Number of requests
Requests granted
Requests denied
Median number of days for substantive response
Mean number of days for substantive response
Requests to delete personal information
26
26
0
1
1.5
Requests to know or access what personal information the data broker was collecting
4
4
0
1
1
Requests to know what personal information the data broker was selling or sharing and to whom
0
0
0
N/A
N/A
Requests to opt out of sale or sharing of personal information
19
19
0
1
1.63
Requests to limit the data broker’s use and disclosure of sensitive personal information
0
0
0
N/A
N/A
*Please note that Interseller is no longer a data broker
Updates to this privacy policy
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time in response to changing legal, technical, or business developments. When we update our Privacy Policy, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will obtain your consent to any material Privacy Policy changes if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws.
You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the “last updated” date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
Contact information
If you have any comments or questions about our Privacy Policy, or to exercise your rights, feel free to contact us at
privacy@greenhouse.io
, or at the mailing address below.
Greenhouse Software, Inc.
228 Park Avenue S. PMB 14744
Attn: Privacy
New York, New York
10003-1502 USA
Archived versions
Greenhouse Privacy Policy - 3/3/2025
Greenhouse Privacy Policy - 6/27/2024
Greenhouse Privacy Policy- 5/25/2018
be_ixf;ym_202503 d_15; ct_100
be_ixf; php_sdk; php_sdk_1.4.26.1
https://greenhouse-production.herokuapp.com/uk/privacy-policy
https://greenhouse-production.herokuapp.com/uk/privacy-policy
By clicking “Accept all cookies,” you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts.
Privacy policy
Cookie preferences
Reject all
Allow all
Set your cookie preference
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Allow all
Manage consent preferences
Always active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookie details‎
Targeting cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookie details‎
Performance cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookie details‎
Functional cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookie details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 5
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
LinkedIn respects your privacy
LinkedIn and 3rd parties use essential and non-essential cookies to provide, secure, analyze and improve our Services, and to show you relevant ads (including
professional and job ads
) on and off LinkedIn. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Select Accept to consent or Reject to decline non-essential cookies for this use. You can update your choices at any time in your
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Privacy Policy
Effective September 18, 2024
LinkedIn's global Privacy Policy below applies worldwide. If you're located in the EU, EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you can review additional information that will apply to you in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Your Privacy Matters
LinkedIn’s mission is to connect the world’s professionals to allow them to be more productive and successful. Central to this mission is our commitment to be transparent about the data we collect about you, how it is used and with whom it is shared.
This Privacy Policy applies when you use our Services (described below). We offer our users
choices
about the data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy,
Cookie Policy
, Settings and our
Help Center.
Choices
﻿
Settings
are available to Members of LinkedIn and Visitors are provided separate controls.
Learn More
.
Table of Contents
Data We Collect
How We Use Your Data
How We Share Information
Your Choices and Obligations
Other Important Information
Introduction
We are a social network and online platform for professionals. People use our Services to find and be found for business opportunities, to connect with others and find information. Our Privacy Policy applies to any Member or Visitor to our Services.
Our registered users (“Members”) share their professional identities, engage with their network, exchange knowledge and professional insights, post and view relevant content, learn and develop skills, and find business and career opportunities. Content and data on some of our Services is viewable to non-Members (“Visitors”).
We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to countries in the European Union (EU), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland. Members and Visitors located in the Designated Countries or the UK can review additional information in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Services
This Privacy Policy, including our Cookie Policy applies to your use of our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to LinkedIn.com, LinkedIn-branded apps, and other LinkedIn-branded sites, apps, communications and services offered by LinkedIn (“Services”), including off-site Services, such as our ad services and the “Apply with LinkedIn” and “Share with LinkedIn” plugins, but excluding services that state that they are offered under a different privacy policy. For California residents, additional disclosures required by California law may be found in our
California Privacy Disclosure
.
Data Controllers and Contracting Parties
If you are in the “Designated Countries”, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (“LinkedIn Ireland”) will be the controller of your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
If you are outside of the Designated Countries, LinkedIn Corporation will be the controller of (or business responsible for) your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
As a Visitor or Member of our Services, the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to this Privacy Policy and other documents referenced in this Privacy Policy, as well as updates.
Change
Changes to the Privacy Policy apply to your use of our Services after the “effective date.”
LinkedIn (“we” or “us”) can modify this Privacy Policy, and if we make material changes to it, we will provide notice through our Services, or by other means, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes before they become effective. If you object to any changes, you may
close your account.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our Services after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
1. Data We Collect
1.1 Data You Provide To Us
You provide data to create an account with us.
Registration
To create an account you need to provide data including your name, email address and/or mobile number, general location (e.g., city), and a password. If you register for a premium Service, you will need to provide payment (e.g., credit card) and billing information.
You create your LinkedIn profile (a complete profile helps you get the most from our Services).
Profile
You have
choices
about the information on your profile, such as your education, work experience, skills, photo,
city or area
, endorsements, and optional
verifications
of information on your profile (such as verifications of your identity or workplace). You don’t have to provide additional information on your profile; however, profile information helps you to get more from our Services, including helping recruiters and business opportunities find you. It’s your choice whether to include
sensitive information
on your profile and to make that sensitive information public. Please do not post or add personal data to your profile that you would not want to be publicly available.
You may give other data to us, such as by syncing your calendar.
Posting and Uploading
We collect personal data from you when you provide, post or upload it to our Services, such as when you fill out a form, (e.g., with demographic data or salary), respond to a survey, or submit a resume or fill out a job application on our Services.
If you sync your calendars with our Services, we will collect your calendar meeting information to keep growing your network by suggesting connections for you and others, and by providing information about events, e.g. times, places, attendees and contacts.
You don’t have to post or upload personal data; though if you don’t, it may limit your ability to grow and engage with your network over our Services.
1.2 Data From Others
Others may post or write about you.
Content and News
You and others may post content that includes information about you (as part of articles, posts, comments, videos) on our Services. We also may collect public information about you, such as professional-related news and accomplishments, and make it available as part of our Services, including, as permitted by your settings, in notifications to others of
mentions in the news
.
Others may sync their calendar with our Services
Contact and Calendar Information
We receive personal data (including contact information) about you when others import or sync their calendar with our Services, associate their contacts with Member profiles, scan and upload business cards, or send messages using our Services (including invites or connection requests). If you or others opt-in to sync email accounts with our Services, we will also collect “email header” information that we can associate with Member profiles.
Customers and partners may provide data to us.
Partners
We receive personal data (e.g., your job title and work email address) about you when you use the services of our customers and partners, such as employers or prospective employers and applicant tracking systems providing us job application data.
Related Companies and Other Services
We receive data about you when you use some of the other services provided by us or our
Affiliates
, including Microsoft. For example, you may choose to send us information about your contacts in Microsoft apps and services, such as Outlook, for improved professional networking activities on our Services
1.3 Service Use
We log your visits and use of our Services, including mobile apps.
We log usage data when you visit or otherwise use our Services, including our sites, app and platform technology, such as when you view or click on content (e.g., learning video) or ads (on or off our sites and apps), perform a search, install or update one of our mobile apps, share articles or apply for jobs. We use log-ins, cookies,
device information
and internet protocol (“IP”) addresses to identify you and log your use.
1.4 Cookies and Similar Technologies
We collect data through cookies and similar technologies.
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
, we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g., pixels and ad tags) to collect data (e.g., device IDs) to recognize you and your device(s) on, off and across different services and devices where you have engaged with our Services. We also allow some others to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy. If you are outside the Designated Countries, we also collect (or rely on others who collect) information about your device where you have not engaged with our Services (e.g., ad ID, IP address, operating system and browser information) so we can provide our Members with relevant ads and better understand their effectiveness.
Learn more
. You can
opt out
from our use of data from cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of others for ad targeting and other ad-related purposes. For Visitors,
the controls are
here
.
1.5 Your Device and Location
We receive data through cookies and similar technologies
When you visit or leave our Services (including some plugins and our cookies or similar technology on the sites of others), we receive the URL of both the site you came from and the one you go to and the time of your visit. We also get information about your network and device (e.g., IP address, proxy server, operating system, web browser and add-ons, device identifier and features, cookie IDs and/or ISP, or your mobile carrier). If you use our Services from a mobile device, that device will send us data about your location based on your phone settings. We will ask you to opt-in before we use GPS or other tools to identify your precise location.
1.6 Communications
If you communicate through our Services, we learn about that.
We collect information about you when you communicate with others through our Services (e.g., when you send, receive, or engage with messages, events, or connection requests, including our marketing communications). This may include information that indicates who you are communicating with and when. We also use
automated systems
to support and protect our site. For example, we use such systems to suggest possible responses to messages and to manage or block content that violates our User Agreement or
Professional Community Policies
.
1.7 Workplace and School Provided Information
When your organization (e.g., employer or school) buys a premium Service for you to use, they give us data about you.
Others buying our Services for your use, such as your employer or your school, provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Services that they purchase for use by their workers, students or alumni. For example, we will get contact information for “
LinkedIn Page
” (formerly Company Page) administrators and for authorizing users of our premium Services, such as our recruiting, sales or learning products.
1.8 Sites and Services of Others
We get data when you visit sites that include our ads, cookies or plugins or when you log-in to others’ services with your LinkedIn account.
We receive information about your visits and interaction with services provided by others when you log-in with LinkedIn or visit others’ services that include some of our plugins (such as “Apply with LinkedIn”) or our ads, cookies or similar technologies.
1.9 Other
We are improving our Services, which means we get new data and create new ways to use data.
Our Services are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
Affiliates
Affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by or under common control with us, including, for example, LinkedIn Ireland, LinkedIn Corporation, LinkedIn Singapore and Microsoft Corporation.
2. How We Use Your Data
We use your data to provide, support, personalize and develop our Services.
How we use your personal data will depend on which Services you use, how you use those Services and the choices you make in your
settings
. We may use your personal data to improve, develop, and provide products and Services, develop and train artificial intelligence (AI) models, develop, provide, and personalize our Services, and gain insights with the help of AI, automated systems, and inferences, so that our Services can be more relevant and useful to you and others. You can review LinkedIn's Responsible AI principles
here
and learn more about our approach to generative AI
here
.
Learn more
about the inferences we may make, including as to
your age and gender
and how we use them.
2.1 Services
Our Services help you connect with others, find and be found for work and business opportunities, stay informed, get training and be more productive.
We use your data to authorize access to our Services and honor your settings.
Stay Connected
Our Services allow you to stay in touch and up to date with colleagues, partners, clients, and other professional contacts. To do so, you can “connect” with the professionals who you choose, and who also wish to “connect” with you. Subject to your and their
settings
, when you connect with other Members, you will be able to search each others’ connections in order to exchange professional opportunities.
We use data about you (such as your profile, profiles you have viewed or data provided through address book uploads or partner integrations) to help others find your profile, suggest connections for you and others (e.g. Members who share your contacts or job experiences) and enable you to invite others to become a Member and connect with you. You can also opt-in to allow us to use your precise location or proximity to others for certain tasks (e.g. to suggest other nearby Members for you to connect with, calculate the commute to a new job, or notify your connections that you are at a professional event).
It is your choice whether to invite someone to our Services, send a connection request, or allow another Member to become your connection. When you invite someone to connect with you, your invitation will include your network and basic profile information (e.g., name, profile photo, job title, region). We will send invitation reminders to the person you invited. You can
choose
whether or not to share your own list of connections with your connections.
Visitors have
choices
about how we use their data.
Stay Informed
Our Services allow you to stay informed about news, events and ideas regarding professional topics you care about, and from professionals you respect. Our Services also allow you to improve your professional skills, or learn new ones. We use the data we have about you (e.g., data you provide, data we collect from your engagement with our Services and inferences we make from the data we have about you), to personalize our Services for you, such as by recommending or ranking relevant content and conversations on our Services. We also use the data we have about you to suggest skills you could add to your profile and skills that you might need to pursue your next opportunity. So, if you let us know that you are interested in a new skill (e.g., by watching a learning video), we will use this information to personalize content in your feed, suggest that you follow certain Members on our site, or suggest related learning content to help you towards that new skill. We use your content, activity and other data, including your name and photo, to provide notices to your network and others. For example, subject to your
settings
, we may notify others that you have updated your profile, posted content, took a
social action
, used a feature, made new connections or were
mentioned in the news
.
Career
Our Services allow you to explore careers, evaluate educational opportunities, and seek out, and be found for, career opportunities. Your profile can be found by those looking to hire (for a job or a
specific task
) or be hired by you. We will use your data to recommend jobs and show you and others relevant professional contacts (e.g., who work at a company, in an industry, function or location or have certain skills and connections). You can signal that you are
interested
in changing jobs and share information with recruiters. We will use your data to recommend jobs to you and you to recruiters. We may use automated systems to provide content and recommendations to help make our Services more relevant to our Members, Visitors and customers. Keeping your profile accurate and up-to-date may help you better connect to others and to opportunities through our Services.
Productivity
Our Services allow you to collaborate with colleagues, search for potential clients, customers, partners and others to do business with. Our Services allow you to communicate with other Members and schedule and prepare meetings with them. If your
settings
allow, we scan messages to provide “bots” or similar tools that facilitate tasks such as scheduling meetings, drafting responses, summarizing messages or recommending next steps.
Learn more
.
2.2 Premium Services
Our premium Services help paying users to search for and contact Members through our Services, such as searching for and contacting job candidates, sales leads and co-workers, manage talent and promote content.
We sell premium Services that provide our customers and subscribers with customized-search functionality and tools (including messaging and activity alerts) as part of our talent, marketing and sales solutions. Customers can export limited information from your profile, such as name, headline, current company, current title, and general location (e.g., Dublin), such as to manage sales leads or talent, unless you
opt-out
. We do not provide contact information to customers as part of these premium Services without your consent. Premium Services customers can store information they have about you in our premium Services, such as a resume or contact information or sales history. The data stored about you by these customers is subject to the policies of those customers. Other enterprise Services and features that use your data include
TeamLink
and
LinkedIn Pages
(e.g., content analytics and followers).
2.3 Communications
We contact you and enable communications between Members. We offer settings to control what messages you receive and how often you receive some types of messages.
We will contact you through email, mobile phone, notices posted on our websites or apps, messages to your LinkedIn inbox, and other ways through our Services, including text messages and push notifications. We will send you messages about the availability of our Services, security, or other service-related issues. We also send messages about how to use our Services, network updates, reminders, job suggestions and promotional messages from us and our partners. You may change your communication
preferences
at any time. Please be aware that you cannot opt out of receiving service messages from us, including security and legal notices.
We also enable
communications
between you and others through our Services, including for example
invitations
,
InMail
,
groups
and
messages
between connections.
2.4 Advertising
We serve you tailored ads both on and off our Services. We offer you choices regarding personalized ads, but you cannot opt-out of seeing non-personalized ads.
We target (and measure the performance of) ads to Members, Visitors and others both on and off our Services directly or through a variety of partners, using the following data, whether separately or combined:
Data collected by advertising technologies on and off our Services using pixels, ad tags (e.g., when an advertiser installs a LinkedIn
tag
on their website), cookies, and other device identifiers;
Member-provided information (e.g., profile, contact information, title and industry);
Data from your use of our Services (e.g., search history, feed, content you read, who you follow or is following you, connections,
groups
participation, page visits, videos you watch, clicking on an ad, etc.), including as described in Section 1.3;
Information from advertising
partners
, vendors and
publishers
; and
Information inferred from data described above (e.g., using job titles from a profile to infer industry, seniority, and compensation bracket; using graduation dates to infer age or using first names or pronoun usage to infer gender; using your feed activity to infer your interests; or using device data to recognize you as a Member).
Learn more
about the inferences we make and how they may be used for advertising.
Learn more
about the ad technologies we use and our advertising services and partners. You can learn more about our compliance with laws in the Designated Countries or the UK in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
We will show you ads called
sponsored content
which look similar to non-sponsored content, except that they are labeled as advertising (e.g., as “ad” or “sponsored”). If you take a social action (such as like, comment or share) on these ads, your action is associated with your name and viewable by others, including the advertiser. Subject to your
settings
, if you take a social action on the LinkedIn Services, that action may be mentioned with related ads. For example, when you like a company we may include your name and photo when their sponsored content is shown.
Ad Choices
You have choices regarding our uses of certain categories of data to show you more relevant ads. Member settings
can be found here
. For Visitors,
the setting is here
.
Info to Ad Providers
We do not share your personal data with any third-party advertisers or ad networks except for: (i) hashed IDs or device identifiers (to the extent they are personal data in some countries); (ii) with your separate permission (e.g., in a lead generation form) or (iii) data already visible to any users of the Services (e.g., profile). However, if you view or click on an ad on or off our Services, the ad provider will get a signal that someone visited the page that displayed the ad, and they may, through the use of mechanisms such as cookies, determine it is you. Advertising partners can associate personal data collected by the advertiser directly from you with hashed IDs or device identifiers received from us. We seek to contractually require such advertising partners to obtain your explicit, opt-in consent before doing so where legally required, and in such instances, we take steps to ensure that consent has been provided before processing data from them.
2.5 Marketing
We promote our Services to you and others.
In addition to advertising our Services, we use Members’ data and content for invitations and communications promoting membership and network growth, engagement and our Services, such as by showing your connections that you have used a feature on our Services.
2.6 Developing Services and Research
We develop our Services and conduct research
Service Development
We use data, including public feedback, to conduct
research
and development for our Services in order to provide you and others with a better, more intuitive and personalized experience, drive membership growth and engagement on our Services, and help connect professionals to each other and to economic opportunity.
Other Research
We seek to create economic opportunity for Members of the global workforce and to help them be more productive and successful. We use the personal data available to us to research social, economic and workplace trends, such as jobs availability and skills needed for these
jobs
and policies that help bridge the gap in various industries and geographic areas. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under
controls
that are designed to protect your privacy. We may also make public data available to
researchers
to enable assessment of the safety and legal compliance of our Services. We publish or allow others to publish economic insights, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
Surveys
Polls and surveys are conducted by us and others through our Services. You are not obligated to respond to polls or surveys, and you have choices about the information you provide. You may
opt-out
of survey invitations.
2.7 Customer Support
We use data to help you and fix problems.
We use data (which can include your communications) to investigate, respond to and resolve complaints and for Service issues (e.g., bugs).
2.8 Insights That Do Not Identify You
We use data to generate insights that do not identify you.
We use your
data
to perform analytics to produce and share insights that do not identify you. For example, we may use your data to generate statistics about our Members, their profession or industry, to calculate ad impressions served or clicked on (e.g., for basic business reporting to support billing and budget management or, subject to your
settings
, for reports to advertisers who may use them to inform their advertising campaigns), to show Members' information about engagement with a
post
or LinkedIn
Page
, to publish visitor demographics for a Service or create demographic workforce insights, or to understand usage of our services.
2.9 Security and Investigations
We use data for security, fraud prevention and investigations.
We and our Affiliates, including Microsoft, may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of the law, our
User Agreement
and/or attempts to harm our Members, Visitors, company, Affiliates, or others.
Social Action
E.g. like, comment, follow, share
Partners
Partners include ad networks, exchanges and others
3. How We Share Information
3.1 Our Services
Any data that you include on your profile and any content you post or social action (e.g., likes, follows, comments, shares) you take on our Services will be seen by others, consistent with your settings.
Profile
Your profile is fully visible to all Members and customers of our Services. Subject to your
settings
, it can also be visible to others on or off of our Services (e.g., Visitors to our Services or users of third-party search tools). As detailed in our
Help Center
, your settings, degree of connection with the viewing Member, the subscriptions they may have, their
usage of our Services
, access channels and search types (e.g., by name or by keyword) impact the availability of your profile and whether they can view certain fields in your profile.
Posts, Likes, Follows, Comments, Messages
Our Services allow viewing and sharing information including through posts, likes, follows and comments.
When you share an article or a post (e.g., an update, image, video or article) publicly it can be viewed by everyone and re-shared anywhere (subject to your
settings
). Members, Visitors and others will be able to find and see your publicly-shared content, including your name (and photo if you have provided one).
In a
group
, posts are visible to others according to group type. For example, posts in private groups are visible to others in the group and posts in public groups are visible publicly. Your membership in groups is public and part of your profile, but you can change visibility in your
settings
.
Any information you share through companies’ or other organizations’ pages on our Services will be viewable by those organizations and others who view those pages' content.
When you follow a person or organization, you are visible to others and that “page owner” as a follower.
We let senders know when you act on their message, subject to your
settings
where applicable.
Subject to your
settings
, we let a Member know when you view their profile. We also give you
choices
about letting organizations know when you've viewed their Page.
When you like or re-share or comment on another’s content (including ads), others will be able to view these “social actions” and associate it with you (e.g., your name, profile and photo if you provided it).
Your employer can see how you use Services they provided for your work (e.g. as a recruiter or sales agent) and related information. We will not show them your job searches or personal messages.
Enterprise Accounts
Your employer may offer you access to our enterprise Services such as Recruiter, Sales Navigator, LinkedIn Learning or our advertising Campaign Manager. Your employer can review and manage your use of such enterprise Services.
Depending on the enterprise Service, before you use such Service, we will ask for permission to share with your employer relevant data from your profile or use of our non-enterprise Services. For example, users of Sales Navigator will be asked to share their “social selling index”, a score calculated in part based on their personal account activity. We understand that certain activities such as job hunting and personal messages are sensitive, and so we do not share those with your employer unless you choose to share it with them through our Services (for example, by applying for a new position in the same company or mentioning your job hunting in a message to a co-worker through our Services).
Subject to your
settings
, when you use workplace tools and services (e.g., interactive employee directory tools) certain of your data may also be made available to your employer or be connected with information we receive from your employer to enable these tools and services.
3.2 Communication Archival
Regulated Members may need to store communications outside of our Service.
Some Members (or their employers) need, for legal or professional compliance, to archive their communications and social media activity, and will use services of others to provide these archival services. We enable archiving of messages by and to those Members outside of our Services. For example, a financial advisor needs to archive communications with her clients through our Services in order to maintain her professional financial advisor license.
3.3 Others’ Services
You may link your account with others’ services so that they can look up your contacts’ profiles, post your shares on such platforms, or enable you to start conversations with your connections on such platforms. Excerpts from your profile will also appear on the services of others.
Subject to your
settings
, other services may look up your profile. When you opt to link your account with other services, personal data (e.g., your name, title, and company) will become available to them. The sharing and use of that personal data will be described in, or linked to, a consent screen when you opt to link the accounts. For example, you may link your Twitter or WeChat account to share content from our Services into these other services, or your email provider may give you the option to upload your LinkedIn contacts into its own service. Third-party services have their own privacy policies, and you may be giving them permission to use your data in ways we would not. You may
revoke
the link with such accounts.
The information you make available to others in our Services (e.g., information from your profile, your posts, your engagement with the posts, or message to Pages)
may be available to them on other services
. For example, search tools, mail and calendar applications, or talent and lead managers may show a user limited profile data (subject to your
settings
), and social media management tools or other platforms may display your posts. The information retained on these services may not reflect updates you make on LinkedIn.
3.4 Related Services
We share your data across our different Services and LinkedIn affiliated entities.
We will share your personal data with our Affiliates to provide and develop our Services. For example, we may refer a query to Bing in some instances, such as where you'd benefit from a more up to date response in a chat experience. In regions outside the Designated Countries, we may also share your publicly-shared content (such as your public LinkedIn posts) with our Affiliates, including Microsoft, to provide or develop their services.
Where allowed
, we may combine information internally across the different Services covered by this Privacy Policy to help our Services be more relevant and useful to you and others. For example, we may personalize your feed or job recommendations based on your learning history.
3.5 Service Providers
We may use others to help us with our Services.
We use others to help us provide our Services (e.g., maintenance, analysis, audit, payments, fraud detection, customer support, marketing and development). They will have access to your information (e.g., the contents of a customer support request) as reasonably necessary to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for other purposes. If you purchase a Service from us, we may use a payments service provider who may separately collect information about you (e.g., for fraud prevention or to comply with legal obligations).
3.6 Legal Disclosures
We may need to share your data when we believe it’s required by law or to help protect the rights and safety of you, us or others.
It is possible that we will need to disclose information about you when required by law, subpoena, or other legal process or if we have a good faith belief that disclosure is reasonably necessary to (1) investigate, prevent or take action regarding suspected or actual illegal activities or to assist government enforcement agencies; (2) enforce our agreements with you; (3) investigate and defend ourselves against any third-party claims or allegations; (4) protect the security or integrity of our Services or the products or services of our Affiliates (such as by sharing with companies facing similar threats); or (5) exercise or protect the rights and safety of LinkedIn, our Members, personnel or others. We attempt to notify Members about legal demands for their personal data when appropriate in our judgment, unless prohibited by law or court order or when the request is an emergency. We may dispute such demands when we believe, in our discretion, that the requests are overbroad, vague or lack proper authority, but we do not promise to challenge every demand. To learn more see our
Data Request Guidelines
and
Transparency Report
.
3.7 Change in Control or Sale
We may share your data when our business is sold to others, but it must continue to be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We can also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity which buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy unless you agree otherwise.
4. Your Choices & Obligations
4.1 Data Retention
We keep most of your personal data for as long as your account is open.
We generally retain your personal data as long as you keep your account open or as needed to provide you Services. This includes data you or others provided to us and data generated or inferred from your use of our Services. Even if you only use our Services when looking for a new job every few years, we will retain your information and keep your profile open, unless you close your account. In some cases we choose to retain certain information (e.g., insights about Services use) in a depersonalized or aggregated form.
4.2 Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
You can access or delete your personal data. You have many choices about how your data is collected, used and shared.
We provide many
choices
about the collection, use and sharing of your data, from deleting or correcting data you include in your
profile
and controlling the visibility of your
posts
to advertising
opt-outs
and
communication
controls. We offer you
settings
to control and manage the personal data we have about you.
For personal data that we have about you, you can:
Delete Data
: You can ask us to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Change or Correct Data
: You can edit some of your personal data through your account. You can also ask us to change, update or fix your data in certain cases, particularly if it’s inaccurate.
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data
: You can ask us to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if we have no legal right to keep using it) or to limit our use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Right to Access and/or Take Your Data
: You can ask us for a copy of your personal data and can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in machine readable form.
Visitors can
learn more about how to make these requests here
. You may also contact us using the contact information below, and we will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
Residents in the
Designated Countries and the UK
, and
other regions
, may have additional rights under their laws.
4.3 Account Closure
We keep some of your data even after you close your account.
If you choose to close your
LinkedIn
account, your personal data will generally stop being visible to others on our Services within 24 hours. We generally delete closed account information within 30 days of account closure, except as noted below.
We retain your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse (e.g., if we have
restricted
your account for breach of our
Professional Community Policies
), enforce our User Agreement, or fulfill your request to "unsubscribe" from further messages from us. We will retain de-personalized information after your account has been closed.
Information you have shared with others (e.g., through InMail, updates or group posts) will remain visible after you close your account or delete the information from your own profile or mailbox, and we do not control data that other Members have copied out of our Services. Groups content and ratings or review content associated with closed accounts will show an unknown user as the source. Your profile may continue to be displayed in the services of others (e.g., search tools) until they refresh their cache.
5. Other Important Information
5.1. Security
We monitor for and try to prevent security breaches. Please use the security features available through our Services.
We implement security safeguards designed to protect your data, such as HTTPS. We regularly monitor our systems for possible vulnerabilities and attacks. However, we cannot warrant the security of any information that you send us. There is no guarantee that data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Please visit our
Safety Center
for additional information about safely using our Services, including
two-factor authentication
.
5.2. Cross-Border Data Transfers
We store and use your data outside your country.
We process data both inside and outside of the United States and rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer data across borders.
Learn more
. Countries where we process data may have laws which are different from, and potentially not as protective as, the laws of your own country.
5.3 Lawful Bases for Processing
We have lawful bases to collect, use and share data about you. You have choices about our use of your data. At any time, you can withdraw consent you have provided by going to settings.
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g., to deliver the LinkedIn Services you have requested) and “legitimate interests.”
Learn more
.
Where we rely on your
consent
to process personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline your consent at any time and where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.
Learn More
. If you have any questions about the lawful bases upon which we collect and use your personal data, please
contact our Data Protection Officer here
.
If you're located in one of the Designated Countries or the UK, you can learn more about our lawful bases for processing in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
5.4. Direct Marketing and Do Not Track Signals
Our statements regarding direct marketing and “do not track” signals.
We currently do not share personal data with third parties for their direct marketing purposes without your permission.
Learn more
about this and about our response to “do not track” signals.
5.5. Contact Information
You can contact us or use other options to resolve any complaints.
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Policy, please first
contact LinkedIn
online. You can also reach us by
physical mail
. If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you have more
options
. Residents in the
Designated Countries
and
other regions
may also have the right to
contact our Data Protection Officer here
or at
DPO@linkedin.com
. If this does not resolve your complaint, Residents in the Designated Countries and other regions may have more
options
under their laws.
Consent
Where we process data based on consent, we will ask for your explicit consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal. Where we rely on contract, we will ask that you agree to the processing of personal data that is necessary for entering into or performance of your contract with us. We will rely on legitimate interests as a basis for data processing where the processing of your data is not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.nextroll.com/privacy:
Business Units
AdRoll
RollWorks
Careers
Culture
Search Jobs
About
Blog
USA
USA
UK
Deutschland
España
Nederland
France
Italia
Ireland
Australia
Careers
Culture
Search Jobs
About
Blog
Service Privacy Notice
Effective as of March 13, 2025
View
archived Privacy Notice
NextRoll, Inc. (formerly AdRoll, Inc.) and its subsidiaries and affiliates (“
we
” “
our
” or “
us
”) is an independent marketing technology company that offers intelligent, data-driven advertising and marketing services and solutions to help big and small companies accelerate their growth (“
Services
”).
We have prepared this Service Privacy Notice to describe the types of data we collect from you, and explain how, why and when we collect this data in order to provide our Services to our Customers. References to
“Customer”
in this Policy Notice refers to any business, brand, marketer and/or advertiser who uses NextRoll’s Services. This Service Privacy Notice also identifies what rights you have concerning the collection of this data, such as the right to opt-out of interest-based advertising (also commonly referred to as targeted or personalized advertising). If you have additional questions, you can visit our
Trust Center
or
Contact Us.
Please note that this Privacy Notice does not apply to data we collect when you visit a NextRoll website, including
https://www.nextroll.com/
,
www.adroll.com
and
https://www.rollworks.com/
. To learn what data we collect when you visit our websites, please visit the
NextRoll Website Privacy Notice
.
Table of Contents
About NextRoll's Services
What Data we Collect
How We Use the Data We Collect
Data Sharing
Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Cookies and Related Technologies
Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Data Retention
Security
International Transfers
Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Information For California Residents Only
Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Make a Privacy Request
Information For Individuals Located in Brazil
Changes to this Service Privacy Notice
Contact Us About Questions
1. About NextRoll's Services
Back to top
NextRoll is a marketing technology company that helps big and small companies deliver products ambitious marketers use and rely on to grow their businesses. Powered by machine learning and integrated data platforms, NextRoll’s intelligent, data-driven marketing and advertising services and solutions go beyond serving digital ads by providing companies better visibility into which audiences are most interested in certain products and services. By using NextRoll’s proprietary data and machine learning offerings (“
NextRoll Technology
”), companies can better understand their current customers, find new loyal customers and build lasting customer relationships through intelligence-driven direct marketing activities.
NextRoll has two different business divisions:
AdRoll
is an e-commerce marketing platform for companies that sell their products and services directly to consumers (called “
Direct to Consumer
” or “
D2C
” companies). The AdRoll platform makes it easy and affordable for D2C companies to deliver the cross-channel experiences consumers expect – enabling
them to sell more to their existing consumers and identify new consumers to introduce to their products and services. AdRoll does this by creating connected, personalized customer journeys that enable brands to reach new and existing customers through digital advertising, email marketing and onsite experiences. AdRoll also helps companies understand the impact of their marketing efforts with advanced measurement and attribution;
RollWorks
offers an account-based platform for businesses who want to sell their products and services to other businesses (called “
Business to Business”
or “
B2B
” companies). Our RollWorks Services help B2B companies identify their target accounts and key buyers, reach those accounts across multiple channels and measure program effectiveness in their system-of-record.
Interest-Based Advertising
NextRoll’s Technology helps our D2C and B2B Customers provide ads and send emails to people that are most likely to find them interesting by showing them ads that are relevant to their specific interests. This is called “interest-based advertising”. We show many of these interest-based ads on websites and mobile apps which rely on advertising revenue to support the content they provide - and what we all consume - for free each day.
When you visit a website or a mobile application (each a “
Digital Property
”) operated by one of our Customers, open an email from a Customer, or get served an ad by us on behalf of our Customer on a third party site, we may collect certain data from your device as described in this Service Privacy Notice. Our platform then uses that data, as well as other data described in
What Data We Collect
, to help our Customers provide ads and send emails to you that aim to be more relevant to you. To see an example of how this works in practice, see
Example of Interest-Based Advertising.
Interest-based advertising enables publishers of Digital Properties to more accurately determine which ads to serve to specific users based on near real-time data. In turn, this allows our Customers to provide more effective advertising that reaches a more precise pool of prospective buyers.
All in all, interest-based advertising promotes better competition in the marketplace (for example, small and medium sized companies have a better opportunity to reach as many prospective buyers as large, well-funded, competitors), and allows our Customers to provide free or low-cost content to their customers due to the resources generated by effective advertising.
Example of Interest-Based Advertising
You’re working from home for the foreseeable future and want to invest in more comfortable work-from-home clothing. You can’t go to the store right now so you decide to peruse some e-commerce sites instead. You go to Google and type in “loungewear” and a list of websites pop up, including one for ABC Sweatshirts. You’re still in the research phase so you browse their site but don’t purchase. Luckily, ABC Sweatshirts is a
customer
of NextRoll and uses the AdRoll technology for its e-commerce platform. Our technology notes that your device visited ABC Loungwear’s website and was looking at sweatshirts.
Later, as you browse the Internet, we show you ads online from ABC Sweatshirts to encourage you to come back and purchase the sweatshirt, perhaps even with a discount offer or notice of an upcoming sale. We may also show you ads from other companies that sell similar products or services you may be interested in to complete your loungewear outfit, such as sweatpants or home slippers. In addition, if you gave ABC Sweatshirts your email address for marketing purposes, we may also send you emails on behalf of the brand that tell you about its new exclusive line of sweatshirts, special promotions, and more. Alternatively, we may use your email to serve you interest-based ads on social media (for example, your social media provider may match a pseudonymized form of your email address that we provide them with the email address details you have registered with your social media account, enabling us to show you interest-based ads in your social media newsfeed)
.
Measurement and Attribution
In addition to interest-based advertising, we also provide various analytics to help our Customers measure the success of their advertising campaigns and identify prospective buyers who may be the most interested in their products or services.
For instance, by collecting a unique identifier (such as a cookie ID) from the devices of users who see our Customers’ ads or visit their Digital Properties, we can measure whether those unique identifiers subsequently took a particular action, such as buying a Customer’s product or visiting their Digital Property (sometimes called a “conversion”). In some cases, we may use our cross device data asset to match unique identifiers (which includes browsing activity) to email addresses. Customers are only notified of a match if the email already exists in the Customer ‘s CRM records. AdRoll’s D2C Services can collect, measure and analyze different types of data in conjunction with these unique identifiers and provide useful information to our AdRoll Customers such as what IP address ranges visitors to their Digital Properties are from (indicating the geographic locations of a visitor, which may help indicate what locations to run a particular ad campaign), what products or services located on their Digital Property are attracting more attention (or less), and what ad campaigns ultimately led a cookie ID back to a Digital Property to view more products or make a purchase.
RollWorks’ B2B Services provide similar types of analytics derived from the same sort of data as AdRoll’s D2C Services described above, but with a focus on firmographic information to provide insights on the type of B2B customers that appear to be interested in specific products or offerings on that Customer’s Digital Property. For example, determining which IP address ranges are associated with a unique identifier (such as a cookie ID) so we can identify companies who may be interested in our Customer’s product or service, or, if a unique identifier is linked to an email address that has already been provided to the B2B customer, RollWorks may alert the Customer of increased browsing activity that indicates interest from a particular known account.
Overall, we use the information learned from unique identifier behavior across the Internet to provide reporting to both our D2C and B2B Customers. A more detailed list of all the data we collect is described in
What Data We Collect.
2. What Data we Collect
Back to top
We collect the following categories of data in the provision of our Services for the purposes explained below.
Data You or Our Customers Provide To Us
Email and CRM data from our Customers
:
Some Customers provide their customer relationship data to us (e.g. name, email address, company address, mobile number) or instruct us to collect clear email addresses on their behalf using NextRoll Technology (“
Customer CRM Data
”) for processing as part of our Services. By doing so, we help our Customers identify who is showing interest on their Digital Properties as well as serve, measure and analyze interest-based ads to their current or potential customers (we may also trigger these ads by licensing
RollWorks B2B Contact Data
to a Customer). For example, if you are browsing a software company’s website and submitted your email to download a white paper, the software company may use our Services to contact you and provide you with more information about the software company’s products that appear to be of most interest to you (subject to the marketing preferences you indicate to the software company). We use our Customer’s CRM Data only as a processor for the purpose of assisting that particular Customer with their own advertising efforts and reporting performance back to the Customer's CRM system. We do not share clear email addresses belonging to one Customer with another Customer.
Shopping Data
:
Some Customers provide us with data about their buyers’ shopping habits, including non-financial transactional data, product codes and check-out activity in addition to the browsing data that we collect. This data may come from their Digital Properties or other non-financial transactional data they maintain. We use this data to help us better target, personalize and measure the effectiveness of advertising campaigns. This data is also Customer CRM Data and belongs to our Customers and is handled by NextRoll as a processor.
Hashed email addresses
:
When a Customer permits us, we collect hashed versions of the email addresses that you have entered on that Customer’s Digital Property. Hashing is a technology process that pseudonymizes email addresses. For instance, when joe
the
cat@nextroll.com is run through a typical hashing function, it becomes a string of digits, such as: 0F0B7B1A1A7E8BDBBC6AA545F8CCD6F83671B32479271BFCB6CC8498912058D5. We take this step to protect email addresses, while being able to use the unique identifier created for the purpose of recognizing you online across Digital Properties and sending you interest-based ads across different devices (computers, tablets and mobile devices) and browsers (also called “cross-device matching”). We describe cross-device matching in further detail in
How We Use the Data We Collect.
Data We Receive in Our Corporate Capacity
:
We also collect data from our own Customers and visitors to our website(s). To learn more about how we collect and use that data, please see our
Website Privacy Notice.
Data We Automatically Collect From Your Device
Unless you have opted-out or have otherwise refused to provide consent, the following is data that we collect from your device automatically:
Cookies:
A unique identifier that NextRoll assigns to you when visiting a Customer’s Digital Property so NextRoll can understand your online journey and have the opportunity to serve ads to you when you visit Publisher’s Digital Properties.
Device Information:
This is technical information about the device you use to access our Customers’ Digital Property, such as your operating system. Additionally, in the case of mobile devices, your device type, and mobile device's unique advertising identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID), and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to the mobile device, such as an Android ID or UDID in older Apple phone models, or a non-cookie unique identifier used by
Non-Cookie Technologies
.
IP Address:
The IP address associated with the device you are using when accessing a Customer’s Digital Property.
Location Data:
This is non-precise information related to your geography derived from your device’s IP address. This does not reveal your precise geographic coordinates (i.e. GPS latitude and longitude) - only country, state, city and zip/postal code, and helps us to display ads that are relevant to your general location (for example, showing ads in French if you are located in France).
Browser Data:
This is technical information about the browser you are using that is captured in order to serve you an ad that can be rendered on your device (for example, Chrome, Firefox, and Safari).
Activity on Customers’ Digital Properties:
This is data about your browsing activity on a Customer’s website or application. This includes, for example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page, whether you downloaded a white paper on a B2B website, what site or ad brought you to the Customer’s website, what items you placed into your online shopping cart and what products were purchased and the price of the products purchased.
Ad Data:
This is data about the online ads we have served (or attempted to serve) to you. This includes , for example, how many times an ad has been served to you, what page the ad appeared on and whether you clicked on or otherwise interacted with the ad.
All of this data is collected to help make sure you get the best and most relevant experience when engaging with our Customers.
Data We Collect From Third Party Sources
Campaign Performance Data:
This data includes information about how well our Customers’ ads and campaigns have performed, whether on our platform or on other advertising platforms.
Data from Audience Partners:
We may collect additional information about you from our audience partners who create and provide us with segments which we use for our Customers (“
Audience Partner
”). A segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g. demographic or firmographic attributes). We use this data to better understand the Customers’ target audience and to better market the Customers’ products and services to you. We may also work with our Customers and Audience Partners to synchronize their unique, pseudonymous identifiers to our own to enable us to more accurately recognize a particular unique browser or device and the advertising interests associated with it (commonly known as “ID or User Syncing”).
Data from Advertising Partners:
This is data that allows us to match the NextRoll cookie identifier with identifiers that may already be used by other companies in the digital advertising ecosystem that we work with (“
Advertising Partners
”). For example, we work with ad exchanges, publishers and supply side platforms (i.e. companies that sell advertising space on publishers’ websites) in order to serve our ads. Matching cookie identifiers helps us deliver ads to you and recognize you across browsers and devices and may include pseudonymous advertising identifiers (meaning identifiers that help identify your browser or device, but not you directly) which some Advertising Partners choose to share with us.
Data collected pursuant to RollWorks Business only:
Email Communications:
Customers may provide us with access to their email communications from their prospects when they have engaged us to provide email marketing services. NextRoll acts as a processor of this CRM Data. . When access to this data involves access to Gmail Data, it will be subject to these additional restrictions:
We will only use access to read, write, modify or control Gmail message bodies (including attachments), metadata, headers, and settings to provide a web email that allows users to compose, send, read and process emails and will not transfer this Gmail Data to others unless doing so is necessary to provide and improve these features, comply with applicable law or as part of a merger, acquisition or sale of assets;
We will not use this Gmail Data for serving advertisements; and
We will not allow humans to read this data unless agreed to by the Customer, doing so is necessary for security purposes such as investigating abuse, to comply with applicable law, or for the provision of NextRoll’s Services.
Contact data from third parties
:
We obtain and collect contact data from various third-party sources, including from public sources and through licenses with data providers. We may also infer contact data based on email addresses and email naming conventions. This contact data is B2B information – in other words, it is typically a business email address, business street address and a business telephone number. Please note that as part of our RollWorks Services, we do not collect business email addresses from third parties for any individuals who are residing in any European Territories (as defined in
International Transfers
).
3. How We Use the Data We Collect
Back to top
Our goal is to leverage this data to help Customers better identify and engage with you and, in turn, provide you with an ideal online experience whereby ad-sponsored content is available for free and the ads served to you are for products and services that aim to be relevant and interesting to you. The data we collect also helps Customers analyze traffic on their Digital Properties, measure the effectiveness of their ad campaigns and gauge the interest of prospective buyers.  Additionally, we use this data to operate, improve and enhance our Services.
Specifically, we use this data for the following purposes:
Interest-Based Advertising:
To select ads that are more likely to be relevant to you based on data such as your browsing activity, the time of day and time spent visiting specific Digital Properties, and non-precise geographic data inferred about your device(s). For example, we may show you ads for your favorite shopping site (or similar sites we think you may like) for goods or services only available in your city, region or country during your lunch or commute hours.
Segmenting Audiences:
To segment you into groups (like bargain hunters, high intent visitors, low intent visitors) for certain purposes such as reporting and analytics as well as determining what ads and email content would best peak your interest.  To do so, we use data from Customer Digital Properties you visit in addition to data provided by the Customer and Audience Partners (i.e. demographic and firmographic information about your unique identifier).
Ad Delivery:
We use data about your browser or other technical information about your device in order to technically deliver advertising and confirm successful delivery of the ad.
Frequency Capping:
We use data about the ads that have been served to you to make sure you will not see the same ad too many times. If we know you’ve already seen one of our Customer’s ads several times, we’ll try to show you a different ad next time.
Sequencing:
If you are being served a sequence of ads, to make sure we show you the right ad next in the sequence.
Mapping data to Our Cross-Device Asset:
NextRoll’s cross-device asset is used to connect multiple devices to one person, household, and/or online identifiers such as an email address (hashed for security) that a Customer may have collected directly from its customers. The cross-device asset allows companies to better understand their known-customer activity, as well as improves the ability to target and measure ad campaigns (including limiting the number of times the same person or household sees an ad).
Cross-device matching
:
Identifying different devices and browsers that are likely to be associated with you so that ads can be targeted, capped and sequenced across those devices, and so that campaign effectiveness can be measured and analyzed. For example, cross-device matching helps us not show you ads for the shoes you were looking at on your phone but already purchased on your tablet. Instead we’ll try to show you ads for an upcoming triathlon where you can put those shoes to work. It also helps us match devices so we can honor your opt-out choices across all devices we know are connected to the opted-out cookie. You may opt-out of cross-device interest-based targeting by employing the respective opt-out techniques we describe in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Targeted Ads
. To learn more about how we use cross-device matching,
visit our blog
.
Syncing Online Identifiers with Customer CRM Data
:
Customers may use NextRoll Services to match online browsing activity indicated by online identifiers with existing email addresses the Customer has already obtained ( i.e. Customer CRM Data).  Customers may also use this information to understand which consumers or business accounts are showing increased interest to better understand their website audience and respond with appropriate marketing activity.
Identifying Companies Associated with an IP Range for B2B marketing
:
We match IP address ranges to companies who disclose their IP address ranges in order to provide aggregated reports to companies regarding their website traffic.
Reporting and Attribution:
By analyzing activity on our Customers’ Digital Properties, we provide our Customers insights into how their ad campaigns are performing and surface insights about their site visitors. Reporting may include ad metrics, such as traffic on certain Digital Properties, measuring impact of campaigns, impressions (ads served), clicks (ads you clicked on) and conversions. What qualifies as a “conversion” is defined by the Customer—it might include, for example, a sale or a white paper download or a correlation to an actual or inferred sale, site visit or store visit. This data allows a Customer to determine if an ad is not performing well (few attributed conversions), so that the Customer can update the ad (perhaps with a better deal!).
Licensing Data:
When we receive an email address for a U.S. resident or obtain attribute data from third party data providers or derive an email address we may license that data to our Customers. For example, our
RollWorks Contact Data Product
provides our Customers with business email addresses.
Conducting Our Corporate Operations:
Data we collect in our corporate capacity (i.e. our own B2B lists of Customers) is used to conduct our business operations and communications. Please see our
Website Privacy Notice
to learn more about how we use that data.
Complying with Legal Process:
To satisfy in good faith any applicable law, legal process or proper governmental request, such as to respond to a subpoena (whether civil or criminal) or similar process.
Investigating Wrongdoing and Protecting Ourselves or Third Parties:
To enforce or investigate any potential violation of our
Terms of Service
, policies or the law, and to protect ourselves, our Customers or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
4. Data Sharing
Back to top
We may disclose data about you with the following third parties:
With a Customer:
We may share data about how you have interacted with a Customer’s Digital Properties, email campaigns or ads.  We may share
business contact data
collected from third party sources or inferred (for example, based on email naming conventions) with a RollWorks B2B Customer if we think that your business or employer would be interested in that Customer’s products. In regards to RollWorks’ Services, we do not collect contact data about residents of European Territories from third parties.
With Our Audience Partners:
We share hashed email addresses or other pseudonymous online identifiers with our Audience Partners in connection with audience creation and modeling and creating segments for the Customer based on the Customer’s CRM Data.
With Our Advertising Partners:
We disclose cookie ID data and the ad we propose to serve with our Advertising Partners, as necessary, to allow for the successful delivery of ads to your device.
With Our Service Providers:
We contract with companies who provide services to us to support our business operations (e.g., for example, website and data hosting, fraud prevention, viewability reporting, data hygiene, marketing and email delivery), as well as billing, collections, tech, customer and operational support.
With Our Subsidiaries and Affiliates:
Our subsidiaries and corporate affiliates will only process your data for the purposes already explained in this Service Privacy Notice. Our subsidiaries are NextRoll Limited (Ireland), AdRoll Limited (UK) and NextRoll Pty Limited (Australia).
In Connection with Legal Proceedings:
When we are under a legal obligation to do so, for example, to comply with a binding order of a court or where disclosure is necessary to exercise, establish or defend the legal rights of NextRoll, our Customer or any other third party.
In Connection with a Sale of Our Business:
If a third party acquires some or all of our business or assets, we may disclose your information in connection with the sale (including during due diligence in preparation for the sale).
5. Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Back to top
NextRoll may aggregate and de-identify data it collects so that it can either no longer be directly or indirectly associated with a natural person or cannot be associated with a natural person at all. NextRoll will then use such data for our machine learning, reporting, analytics and other business purposes.
We may also share aggregated and de-identified data with our subsidiaries and affiliates.
6. Cookies and Related Technologies
Back to top
NextRoll offers a consent management platform that adheres to the latest Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB) Transparency and Consent Framework (TCF). Our commitment to the principles outlined in the IAB TCF are provided in our
TCF Attestation
.
NextRoll Technology uses cookies, tracking pixels and related technologies to provide our Services to our Customers. Cookies are small data files that are served by our platform and stored on your device. You can refuse consent to, or opt-out of, NextRoll cookies at any time, as explained in
Your Choices and Opting-out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
below. The NextRoll cookie we serve through our NextRoll Technology for this purpose is named “__adroll”, “__ar_v4”, “_adroll_shared” and “__adroll_fpc.”
Our Advertising Partners may also drop cookies for the purposes described in
What Data We Collect
. Generally, the type of cookies dropped will vary depending on the Advertising Partner. We provide a list of our Advertising Pixel Partners
here
.
Additionally, we use
non-tracking cookies
to store user decisions in terms of your ad consent and opt-out choices:
We may drop a __adroll cookie with value opt-out if you opt-out as described below.
We may drop a __consent cookie that stores the consent choices you have made regarding data processing and advertising by NextRoll.
We may drop a__adroll_post_consent_html for custom HTML to display to the user confirming consent selection.
We may drop a__adroll_post_consent_css for custom CSS (website design) to style the confirm GDPR consent selection.
We may drop a__adroll_consent_params cookie GDPR consent parameters for recording via ad server callbacks.
We may drop a __adroll_bounced3 for users redirected through Safari bounce.
We may drop a__adroll_bounce_closed for Safari banner closure.
We may drop a__adroll_load_stats to determine how many times the Safari banner was loaded.
A full list of NextRoll cookies is set out below:
Tracking cookies
Non-tracking cookies
__adroll
__ar_v4
__adroll_shared
__adroll_fpc
__adroll_consent_params
__adroll_post_consent_html
__adroll_post_connsent_css
__adroll_bounced3
__adroll_bounce_closed
__adroll_load_stats
7. Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Back to top
In respect of website visitors with IP addresses
not from a European Territory
, NextRoll and some of its Advertising Partners may use technologies other than cookie technology to recognize your computer, device or browser for the purposes of interest-based advertising, analyzing engagement with ads or content, measuring the effectiveness of a particular ad campaign or marketing effort, to monitor against fraud or misuse of our Services, or in other ways described in this Service Privacy Notice in
How We Use the Data We Collect
. This use of non-cookie technology may be used in addition to cookies, or separately, to collect and record data about your web browsing activities on browsers, search engines or other platforms that may not utilize NextRoll Technology.
You may opt-out of tracking via non-cookie technologies by employing the respective opt-out techniques described in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics Ads
.
8. Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Back to top
You can control how you share your data with NextRoll, including electing to opt-out of interest-based advertising altogether. Please visit our
opt-out webpage
to opt-out.
Generally speaking, an opt-out allows you to direct NextRoll not to engage in a particular type of data collection. There are many different ways that NextRoll collects data, different purposes for that data collection, and different industry-specific and NextRoll-specific tools for opting-out. We describe below the different options for controlling how NextRoll uses your data:
Web browser:
You can opt-out of receiving interest-based ads served by us or on our behalf by clicking on the blue icon
that typically appears in the corner of the ads we serve and following the instructions provided or by clicking on our
opt-out page
. Please note that this opt-out function is browser-specific and relies on an opt-out cookie. This means if you delete your cookies or upgrade your browser after having opted out, you will need to opt-out again.
Cross Device Opt-Out:
As described above in
How We Use the Data We Collect
, we may link multiple browsers or devices to the cookie ID, hashed email address or other unique identifiers associated with you. If you opt-out on a browser or device and we have additional devices or browsers linked to you, we will extend your opt-out decision to any other linked browsers and devices. Since we only link users across browsers and devices in certain conditions, there may be cases where you are still being tracked in a different browser or device we have not linked, and where we are treating you as a different user.
Mobile Device Opt-Out:
To opt-out of receiving interest-based ads that are based on your behavior across different mobile applications, see instructions for iOS and Android devices:
iOS 7 or Higher:
Go to your Settings > Select Privacy > Select Advertising > Enable the “Limit Ad Tracking” setting; and
For Android devices with OS 2.2 or higher and Google Play Services version 4.0 or higher:
Open your Google Settings app > Select Ads > Enable “Opt-out of interest-based advertising.”
Industry Opt-Out Tools and Self-Regulation:
NextRoll is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (
NAI
) and adheres to the framework principles. You may use the
NAI opt-out tool
which will allow you to opt-out of seeing interest-based ads from us and from other NAI approved member companies. In addition, the NAI opt-out tool allows you to separately opt-out of “audience matched” advertising through the NAI’s “
Audience Matched Advertising Opt-Out
.” You can also use the
email opt-out tool
provided by our Advertising Partner, LiveRamp, to opt-out your email address from their database. Audience matching is a particular type of interest-based advertising where de-identified data (e.g. hashed emails) is tied to “offline” activity or information (this information generally is or can be associated with a consumer’s email address - whether that information is part of our Customer’s own customer lists or in lists we license to the Customer). To do “audience matching,” we or another platform then “match” that information (in de-identified form) to cookie IDs, mobile ad IDs, or other online identifiers. We describe this hashing activity in additional detail in
What Data We Collect
. Because this “audience matched” information is derived from an email address or information that can be tied to an email address, it is possible to opt-out with an email address. However, when you opt-out this way, you will need to submit all of the email addresses that you use for the opt-out to work.
We also comply with the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance (
DAA
). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners, via the
DAA website
.
We also comply with the Canadian Self-regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (
DAAC
). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners, via the
DAAC website
.
Finally, we also adhere to the European Interactive Advertising Digital Alliance (EDAA) guidelines for online advertising. You may opt-out via the
EDAA website
.
9. Data Retention
Back to top
Customer CRM Data:
The data retention period for Customer CRM Data is as follows:
If either Customer or NextRoll explicitly terminates the NextRoll Services in accordance with our Terms of Service, NextRoll will delete Customer CRM Data within 90 days from the termination date.
If a Customer’s account has been suspended for 90 days or more, the Customer CRM Data will be deleted.
When a Customer has not logged in to their NextRoll account in the past 365 days
and
there has been no product usage in the past 30 days
and
no media spend has occurred in the past 30 days, the Customer CRM Data will be deleted when the 366th day of no login activity occurs for the account.
Customers may request deletion of Customer CRM Data by visiting the privacy requests
webpage
.
Mobile Identifiers and Cookie Identifiers:
Cookies we set expire (and are then deleted) 13 months from the last time your device accessed a Digital Property using NextRoll Technology. If you visit another Digital Property that uses our technology inside that 13-month expiry period, then the expiry period will be reset and measured from that date instead. The expiration period for mobile identifiers is controlled by you on your device.
Personal Data Associated with Mobile and Cookie Identifiers Related to Browsing History:
We delete personal data associated with mobile and cookie identifiers after 12 months (for example, data such as a Customer’s website you visited or ads that you may have clicked).
Personal Data Associated with Advertising Bidding Requests:
Data logged in order to process an advertising bid request we have received from an Advertising Partner (such as a cookie identifier, IP address, the domain url requesting to display the ad, and browser information) are deleted after 7 days. Data we have logged regarding bids we have placed to display an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, mobile identifiers, the advertisement bid on and the advertisement won or displayed to the visitor) are deleted after 15 days.
Personal Data Associated with the Display of an Advertisement:
Data logged for the display of an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, the advertisement won or displayed to you and data indicating whether you clicked on the particular advertisement displayed) are deleted after 12 months.
Hashed Email Addresses:
Hashed email addresses collected from Customer site visitors are deleted 12 months from the last date the hashed email was collected.
10. Security
Back to top
We apply technical, administrative and organizational security measures to protect the data we collect against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access, in particular where the processing involves the transmission of data over a network, and against other unlawful forms of processing. NextRoll has also completed the SOC2 Type 2 Audit (Security and Privacy) with no exceptions. This report is only available to Customers by a request to
support@nextroll.com
.
11. International Transfers
Back to top
We may transfer the data we collect about you to countries (including the United States of America) other than the country where we originally collected it for the purposes of performing our Services. In general, the transferring countries will be the countries in which we, our Customers, our Advertising Partners, or their service providers operate.
Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as your country. However, when we transfer your data to other countries, we will protect that data as described in this Service Privacy Notice and take steps, where necessary, to ensure that international transfers comply with applicable laws.
For example, when we transfer your data from a European Territory (as defined below) to our parent company in the United States, we do so under the European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses. These Standard Contractual Clauses are incorporated in the
NextRoll Data Protection Addendum
between NextRoll and each of our Customers where applicable. When we transfer your data outside of a European Territory to Advertising Partners (or vice versa), we do so under lawful data export mechanisms which may include Standard Contractual Clauses and Binding Corporate Rules.
12. Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Back to top
Our Legal Basis:
If you interact with our Services from the European Territories, our legal basis for collecting and using the personal data described above will depend on the personal data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. For these purposes, "
European Territories
" means the European Economic Area, Switzerland and the United Kingdom.
We will normally process personal data about you based on consent (except where the purpose of processing is based on legitimate interest, as described in the “vendor” details of the Consent Management Tool presented to you while visiting Digital Properties from the European Territories). For example, when you visit a Customer’s Digital Property, you will be asked to consent to NextRoll dropping a cookie.
If you have questions about, or need further information concerning, the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please email
dpo@nextroll.com
.
European Residents’ Privacy Rights:
In addition, if you are a resident of a European Territory, you have the following data subject access rights under EU data protection law:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, please visit our
privacy requests webpage
to obtain a verifiable request form.
If you wish to object to us processing your personal data or would like to otherwise restrict the processing of your personal data, we will honor that request. Please visit the
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
portion of this Service Privacy Notice to select the best opt-out method for you.
Similarly, if we process your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. You can also refuse consent for NextRoll or our Advertising Partners to drop cookies by visiting our
opt-out page
or by refusing consent for NextRoll (or changing your consent preferences) when you see a Consent Management Tool displayed on a Customer site which lists NextRoll as a vendor.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Territories are available from the
European Data Protection Board website
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your personal data, we encourage you to contact us first at
support@nextroll.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
.
In some cases, we act as a processor for our Customers (for example, when we handle our Customers’ CRM data solely to provide them Services) and, in those cases, you should direct any requests to exercise your data protection rights to the relevant Customer. If you are uncertain whether we process your personal data as a controller or a processor in any specific context, you can contact us at
support@nextroll.com
and we will advise you accordingly.
13. Information For California Residents Only
Back to top
This section supplements the information contained in this Service Privacy Notice and applies solely to visitors, users and others who are residents of the State of California, as defined in Section 17014 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations. This section is provided to comply with the
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (
CPRA
), and regulations promulgated thereunder as each may be amended from time to time (collectively, the “
CCPA
”). Any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this section.
Information We Collect and the Purposes for Which this Information is Used
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device (“
personal information
”). This collection of information is listed in
What Data We Collect.
We set out below the CCPA categories of personal information we have collected from consumers within the last twelve (12) months in respect of our Services. Please note that personal information in certain categories may overlap with other categories.
A.
Identifiers
Yes
Device IP address, email address, cookie string data, pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails), operating system, and your device type, and mobile device's identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID) and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to any device by third parties and cross-referenced to recognize a device.
Directly and indirectly from consumers, third party data providers, ad exchanges, supply-side platforms and Audience Partners. In the case of business email addresses, RollWorks B2B Services may infer a business email address.
B.
Personal information listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
Yes
Name, business address, business telephone number, education, employment, employment history, household income.the perceived general education level of consumers may be collected for marketing, advertising and analytics.
Directly from third party data providers and Audience Partners.
C.
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Yes
Limited to age ranges such as 35-44, 45-54, 55-64 and 65+ and male/female gender categories are sometimes collected for use for NextRoll Services that do not carry a risk of unintended discrimination.
Audience Partners.
D.
Commercial information
Yes
Records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Directly from consumers and Customers.
E.
Biometric information
No
-
-
F.
Internet or other similar network activity
Yes
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application or advertisement. For example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page, whether you downloaded a white paper on a B2B website, what items you placed into your online shopping cart, what products were purchased and the price of the products purchased.
Directly from browsing history on Customers’ Digital Properties.
Non-personal information about one of our ads (e.g. the third party who served the ad, and the name of the ad) may be connected with browsing history or activity on our websites for the purposes of determining attribution information (e.g. whether particular ad led to a consumer visiting our website, and, if so, which particular ad campaign).
G.
Geolocation data
Yes
Non-precise geolocation derived from IP address.
Directly from consumers, ad exchanges, publishers and supply-side platforms and Audience Partners.
H.
Sensory data
No
-
-
I.
Professional or employment-related information
Yes
Current or past job history, including details about the employer (industry, name, company location, company domain or URL), and employee (positions held, duration of employment, and office location of the company where the employee worked).
Directly from third party data providers and Audience Partners.
J.
Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R Part 99))
No
-
-
K.
Inferences drawn from other personal information
Yes
Creating profiles that reflect consumer preferences and interests.
Directly from Audience Partners.
L.
Sensitive personal information
Yes
Personal information that reveals a consumer’s financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account.
Personal information that relates to the analysis of an individual's physical or mental health may be collected to the extent that the following constitute collection of sensitive personal information:
purchase or browsing history for over-the-counter medications or devices that inform targeted ad selection; and
browsing history and inquiry for services such as elective surgeries, allergy treatments, and health-education or support groups that inform targeted ad selection.
NextRoll does not create consumer profiles based on perceived interest or association with the categories of information related to health information (for example, NextRoll does not have consumer profiles for “allergies” or “ankle surgery,” etc.). NextRoll does not purchase consumer profiles that reflect consumer preferences and interests related to health.The consumer-profile interests NextRoll permits for targeted advertising can be found
here
.
Directly from Customers and consumers.
Purposes for Which Personal Information is Collected
All data we collect is primarily for the commercial purpose of providing marketing, advertising (i.e., cross-context behavioral advertising) and analytical Services. However, as part of performing these Services, we also use data collected for the following additional business purposes:
Auditing Interactions with Consumers: to count ad impressions and verify the quality of ad impressions served to unique visitors identified by cookie id or other unique identifier;
Debugging and Repair:  the identification and repair of impairments to intended and existing functionalities in our Services and NextRoll Technology, perform debugging and related activities to repair errors that impair the functionality of our Services;
Security:  to detect security incidents and protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, including, when necessary, to prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Internal Research and Development:  to conduct internal research for technological development of our Services and demonstration of the performance of these Services; and
Quality and Safety Maintenance and Verification:  to verify the quality or safety of our Services and improve, upgrade or enhance our Services and NextRoll Technology.
For more information on how we use this data, please refer to
How We Use the Data We Collect.
Disclosure of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
NextRoll discloses personal data for business purposes as set out in
Purposes for which Personal Information is Collected
above. We disclose, or otherwise share as indicated below, the categories of personal information to the categories of third parties as set out in
Data Sharing
.
Sharing Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have shared, and/or sold, the following categories of personal information for the commercial purpose of providing cross-context behavioral advertising (known as retargeted or interest based advertising) services:
Category A (Identifiers). By serving ads on digital publisher sites such as news, blogs and weather sites we share and/or sell cookie string data and pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails) from Category A (identifiers) with Advertising Partners and Advertising Partners.
Category F (Internet or other similar network activity). NextRoll may share and/or sell browsing information (e.g., page views on a NextRoll customer site or ads served or clicked) to NextRoll customers about end users who have visited the customer’s site.
Sales of Personal Information
In the preceding (12) twelve months, we have sold the following categories of personal information:
Category A (Identifiers). Pursuant to our
RollWorks B2B Contact Data
Service, we have sold personal information in the form of business emails from Category A (Identifiers) to Customers.
NextRoll does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares the personal information of minors.
To opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information visit our
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information page
.
Furthermore, NextRoll processes interest based advertising opt-out preference signals via global privacy controls. To use this method, you must download and enable global privacy controls on a participating browser or browser extension.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes the rights of California residents and provides information on how to exercise those rights.
Right to Know and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
)
we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (otherwise known as a data portability request); and
Two separate lists where we have sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose:
Sales: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
Disclosures for a business purpose: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained
Right to Delete
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collect from you and retain, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
), we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relations with you or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights or exercise another right provided by law;
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.);
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided informed consent;
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation; and
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Right to Correct
You have the right to request that a business correct inaccurate personal Information that is maintained about you, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal Information.
Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
), we will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct (and direct our service providers to do the same) your personal information, unless an exception applies.
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
To exercise the right to know, data portability and deletion rights described above, please submit the consumer request to us by either:
Calling us at 1-844-740-7126; or
Visiting our
privacy requests webpage.
After submitting the request, a form will be sent to the requestor to verify the consumer request.
On the verification form, the requestor must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative; and
Describe the request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate and respond to it.
Only you, or a person that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot: (i) verify your identity or authority to make the request; and (ii) confirm the personal information relates to you.
We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We will deliver our written response to you electronically unless you indicate delivery to be by mail.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot complete a request, if applicable. Please note that personal information deleted during this period as set out in
Data Retention
will not be provided.
The format of our responses to you concerning personal information collected, disclosed or sold will be provided in a readily useable format that should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
CCPA Metrics
To view metrics regarding consumer requests to know, delete, and opt out, for the previous calendar year (January 1 - December 31) please visit our CCPA Metrics
webpage
.
Right to Limit Collection of Sensitive Personal Information
You have the right to limit the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information by the business by visiting our
opt-out
page or
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information page
, or through the instructions provided in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics Ads
.
Right to Opt out of the Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information
To exercise the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information you (or your authorized representative) may visit  the
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
webpage.
Opt Out Preference Signals
If you are visiting a site with NextRoll’s Technology, you may opt-out of the sale or sharing of your data by broadcasting an Opt-Out Preference Signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (“
GPC
”) (on the browsers and/or browser extensions that support such a signal). If you do not have an account on the site you are browsing or if you are not logged into your account while browsing, your request to opt-out will be linked to your browser identifier only and not linked to any account information because the connection between your browser and the account is not known to NextRoll. Please also check for the Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information or Privacy Choices link on the sites you visit.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services;
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties;
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services;
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services; or
Retaliate against an employee, applicant, or independent contractor’s right to exercise their CCPA rights.
14. Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Back to top
Exercising Your Consumer Rights.
Several US state privacy laws provide residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. Consumers in these states can exercise their rights via the methods described above under the headings:
Exercising Right to Know
;
Data Portability
; Right to Deletion; and Right to Correct. To appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, or to contact NextRoll, please view the
Contact Us About Questions section
.
The Sale of Personal Information and Processing for Targeted Advertising
For information on the sale of your personal information and how to opt out, see
Sales of Personal Information
. NextRoll processes personal information for targeted advertising. See
How We Use the Data We Collect
above. To opt out of targeted advertising, see
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
, or visit the “Privacy Choices” link in the footer of all NextRoll webpages:
15. Make a Privacy Request
Back to top
To exercise the right to know (access), data portability and deletion rights (right to be forgotten), please submit the consumer request to us by either:
Calling us at 1-844-740-7126; or
Visiting our
privacy requests webpage
.
16. Information for Individuals Located in Brazil
Back to top
Please view NextRoll’s disclosures pursuant to the Brazilian Data Protection Law, the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“
LGPD
”),
here
.
17. Changes to this Service Privacy Notice
Back to top
We may update or modify this Service Privacy Notice at our discretion at any time. When we make changes to this Service Privacy Notice we will post the updated notice online and update the notice’s effective date. Please review this Service Privacy Notice periodically.
If we are required by applicable law to obtain your consent to any material changes before they come into effect, then we will do so in accordance with law.
18. Contact Us About Questions
Back to top
If you have any questions about this Service Privacy Notice or our privacy practices, or want to appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, you can contact
support@nextroll.com
.
If you are located in a European Territory then, where we process your data as a data controller, NextRoll Limited is the data controller of your information. To contact NextRoll Limited please email
support@nextroll.com
or write to us at the following address:
NextRoll Limited
Attn: Legal
Floor 3, Block 3
Miesian Plaza
Dublin 2, Ireland
D02 Y754
If you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
:
Lucid Privacy Group
NextRoll Data Protection Officer
1050 Page Street
San Francisco, CA 94117
USA
Website Privacy Notice
Effective as of March 13, 2025
View archived Privacy Policy
NextRoll, Inc. (formerly AdRoll, Inc.) and its subsidiaries and affiliates (“
we
,” “
our
” or “
us
”) is an independent marketing technology company that offers intelligent, data-driven advertising and marketing services and solutions to help big and small companies accelerate their growth (“
Services
”).
Please note that this Privacy Notice only applies to data that we collect when you visit a NextRoll website or a mobile application, including
connect.adroll.com
,
app.adroll.com
,
www.nextroll.com
,
www.adroll.com
,
pages.adroll.com
,
www.rollworks.com
,
pages.rollworks.com
,
https://blog.adrollgroup.com
,
help.adroll.com
,
tech.adroll.com
, or
developers.adroll.com
(each a "
Digital Property
"). To learn what data we collect when you visit the websites of our Advertisers, please visit the
NextRoll Service Privacy Notice
.
Table of Contents
About NextRoll's Services
What Data We Collect
How We Use the Data We Collect
Data Sharing
Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Cookies and Related Technologies
Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Data retention
Security
International Transfers
Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Information for California Residents Only
Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Information for Individuals Located in Brazil
Changes to this Privacy Notice
Contact Us About Questions
1. About NextRoll's Services
Back to top
NextRoll is a marketing technology company that helps big and small companies deliver products ambitious marketers use and rely on to grow their businesses. Powered by machine learning and integrated data platforms, NextRoll’s intelligent, data-driven marketing and advertising services and solutions go beyond serving digital ads by providing companies better visibility into which audiences are most interested in certain products and services.  By using NextRoll’s proprietary data and machine learning offerings (“NextRoll Technology,”), companies can better understand their customers, find new loyal customers and build lasting customer relationships through intelligence-driven marketing activities.
NextRoll has two different business divisions:
AdRoll
is an e-commerce marketing platform for companies that sell their products and services directly to consumers (called “Direct to Consumer” or “D2C” companies). The AdRoll platform makes it easy and affordable for D2C companies to deliver the cross-channel experiences consumers expect – enabling them to sell more to their existing consumers, and also to identify new consumers to introduce to their products and services. AdRoll does this by creating connected, personalized customer journeys that enable brands to reach new and existing customers through digital advertising, email marketing and onsite experiences, and helps companies understand the impact of their marketing efforts with advanced measurement and attribution;
RollWorks
offers an account-based platform for businesses who want to sell their products and services to other businesses (called “Business to Business” or “B2B” companies). Our RollWorks Services help B2B companies identify their target accounts and key buyers, reach those accounts across multiple channels and measure program effectiveness in their system-of-record.
The NextRoll websites are a collection of sites that we use to describe our Services to potential customers, to provide our Services to our Customers, and to support Customers and partners as they seek to identify, deploy and measure their marketing and advertising efforts with us over time.
For more information on the data collected through our Services, please see our
Service Privacy Notice
.
2. What Data We Collect
Back to top
We may collect the following categories of information on our Digital Properties and use them for the purposes explained below.
Data You Provide To Us
Contact Information:
You may provide us with your name, address, phone number and email when you set up an account with us and you may provide your name, title, company, email, address and/or phone number when you sign up for an event with us online or download content from our Digital Properties.
Account Information:
If you open an account, we will collect your username and password and other information necessary to open and access your account.
Customer Service Information:
Information you may provide to our customer service including your email address for purposes of responding to your inquiries and survey responses.
Financial Information:
Credit card number or other payment account information. This information is collected directly by our payments processor and not stored by NextRoll.
Hashed email addresses:
We collect hashed versions of the email addresses that you enter on our Digital Properties. Hashing is a technology process that pseudonymizes (i.e. digitally scrambles) email addresses. For instance, when joe_the_cat@nextroll.com is run through a typical hashing function, it becomes a string of digitsm such as: 0F0B7B1A1A7E8BDBBC6AA545F8CCD6F83671B32479271BFCB6CC8498912058D5. We take this step to de-identify data and protect email addresses. We use the hashed email  created for the purpose of recognizing you and sending your interest-based ads across different devices (computers, tablets and mobile devices) and browsers (also called “cross-device matching”). We describe cross-device matching in further detail in
How We Use the Data We Collect
.
Information about your business:
You may use the tools available on NextRoll’s Digital Properties to learn more about how NextRoll’s Services can help you grow your business.  If you are an existing Customer, we may use the information you provide about your business when using our online tools to add to your existing Customer profile with NextRoll.
Data We Automatically Collect From Your Device
Cookies:
A unique identifier that NextRoll assigns to you when visiting one of our sites so we can understand your online journey and have the opportunity to serve ads to you when you visit a publisher’s site.
Device Information:
This is technical information about the device you use to access our Digital Properties such as your operating system. Additionally, in the case of mobile devices, your device type, unique advertising identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID) and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to the mobile device, such as an Android ID or UDID in older Apple phone models, or a non-cookie unique identifier used by
Non-Cookie Technologies
.
IP Address:
The IP address associated with the device you are using when visiting a NextRoll Digital Property.
Location Data:
This is non-precise information related to your geography derived from your device’s IP address. This does not reveal your precise geographic coordinates (i.e. your GPS latitude and longitude) - only country, state, city and zip/postal code, and helps us to display ads that are relevant to your general location (for example, showing ads in French if you are located in France).
Browser Data:
This is technical information about the browser you are using that is captured in order to serve you an ad that can be rendered on your device (for example, Chrome, Firefox, and Safari).
Activity on our Digital Properties:
This is data about your browsing activity on our Digital Properties and your interactions with our other tools or dashboards. For example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page or whether you downloaded a white paper.
Ad Data:
This is data about the online ads we have served (or attempted to serve) to you. This includes, for example, how many times an ad has been served to you, what page the ad appeared on and whether you clicked on or otherwise interacted with the ad.
All this data is collected to help make sure you get the best and most relevant experience when engaging with NextRoll.
Data We Collect from Third Party Sources
Data from Audience Partners:
We may collect additional information about you from our audience partners who create and provide us with segments of our own customers (“Audience Partner”). A segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g. firmographic attributes).  We use this data to better understand our target audience and to better market our Services to you.
Data from Advertising Partners:
This is data that allows us to match the NextRoll cookie identifier with identifiers that may already be used by other companies in the digital advertising ecosystem that we work with (“Advertising Partners”). For example, we work with ad exchanges, publishers and supply side platforms (i.e. companies that sell advertising space on publishers’ websites) in order to serve our ads. Matching cookie identifiers helps us deliver ads to you and recognize you across browsers and devices, and may include pseudonymous advertising identifiers (meaning identifiers that help identify your browser or device, but not you directly) which some Advertising Partners choose to share with us.
Contact Data from Third Parties:
We obtain and collect contact data from various third party sources, including from public sources and through licenses with data providers. This contact data is B2B information – in other words, it is typically a business email address, business street address, or sometimes, a business telephone number.
3. How We Use the Data We Collect
Back to top
Specifically, we use this data for:
Interest-Based Advertising:
Serving you ads for certain NextRoll Services that are more likely to be relevant to you based on your browsing activity, the time of day you visit our Digital Properties and the time you spend on them, and non-precise geographic data inferred about your device/s. For example, we may show you ads for our Service  only available in your city, region or country during your lunch or commute hours. For more information about how our Services work, please see our Service Privacy Notice.
Segmenting Audiences:
We use data from our Digital Properties you visit in addition to data from Audience Partners to segment you into groups (like high or low intent visitors) for reporting, analytics and determining what ads and email content would best peak your interest.
Ad delivery:
We use data about your browser or other technical information about your device in order to deliver advertising and confirm successful delivery of the ad.
Frequency Capping:
We use data about ads that have been served to you to make sure that you don't see the same NextRoll ad too many times.
Sequencing:
If you are being served a sequence of ads, we do this to make sure we show you the right ad next in the sequence.
Mapping Data to our Cross-Device Asset:
NextRoll cross-device asset is used to connect multiple devices to one person, household, and/or online identifiers such as an email address (hashed for security) that you may have submitted to NextRoll.  Our cross-device asset allows us to better understand your online activity and helps us improve our ability to target and measure ad campaigns (including limiting the number of times you or your household sees an ad for NextRoll Services).
Cross-Device Matching:
Identifying different devices and browsers that are likely to be associated with you so that ads can be targeted, capped and sequenced across those devices, and so that campaign effectiveness can be measured and analyzed. For example, cross-device matching helps us not show you ads for the shoes you were looking at on your phone but already purchased on your tablet. Instead we’ll try to show you ads for an upcoming triathlon where you can put those shoes to work. It also helps us match devices so we can honor your opt-out choices across all devices we know are connected to the opted-out cookie. You may opt-out of cross-device interest-based targeting by employing the respective opt-out techniques we describe in
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Targeted Ads
. To learn more about how we use cross-device matching, click
here
.
Syncing Online Identifiers with Customer CRM Data:
If you have provided us with your email address, we may match your online browsing activity indicated by online identifiers.  We may use this information to see if you are showing increased interest in our products and services to better understand our website audience and to respond with appropriate marketing activity.
Identifying Companies Associated with an IP Range for B2B Marketing:
We match IP address ranges to companies who disclose their IP address ranges to analyze and report our website traffic.
Reporting and Attribution:
Analyzing how our ads are performing and gaining insights into our Customers and prospective customers. Reporting may include ad metrics such as attribution (described above), impressions (ads served), clicks (ads you clicked on) and conversions (for example, if you create an account with us or download a white paper from our site). This helps us identify ads that are most useful to you and demonstrates NextRoll’s value. Relatedly, this also helps us identify an ad that is not performing well, allowing us to update our ad or ad campaign strategy.
Providing our Services and Customer Support:
For example, to monitor usage of features, manage campaigns and log data for audit purposes. We may contact you when you ask us for support or when it appears to us that you might need support. We maintain records of our communications with you for future reference.
Billing:
Invoice you and collect fees for services we have provided.
Troubleshoot Problems:
To monitor and fix our website performance, for example, if the site is slow, not loading properly, or to investigate aberrations in performance of our Services.
Prevent Potential Fraud and Enforce our Terms of Service:
To prevent fraud on our sites or through the use of our Services,to enforce our Terms of Service or other policies or investigate any potential violation of those Terms and policies, any potential violation of the law, or to protect ourselves, our Customers or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
Customize, Measure and Improve our Websites and Services:
To provide customized content and to measure which content is most helpful (or unhelpful) to our Customers, which helps improve our website and our services. For example, if we notice higher visits to certain Help Center articles or receive higher customer support tickets for specific issues, we can improve our support materials or identify areas where we can make our product better for our Customers.
Contact You About Your Account or our Services, Including to Market our Services to You or Provide Updates:
We may use your contact information to contact you about your account, for example, in relation to the performance of your campaigns, to follow up on billing issues or to tell you about new Services we are offering. We may send you product updates, performance information, surveys or communicate with you in other ways about our services. When we can legally do so, we may augment the information you give us in order to contact you by phone or even snail mail. You can opt-out of receiving emails by unsubscribing through the link at the bottom of our emails or by updating your email preferences
here
. You can let us know if you don’t want to receive phone calls or other marketing materials from us by contacting
support@nextroll.com
.
Conducting Our Corporate Operations.
Data collected in our corporate capacity, such as our own B2B lists of Customers and prospective customers, is used to conduct our business operations and send communications.
Complying with Legal Process:
To satisfy in good faith any applicable law, legal process or proper governmental request, such as to respond to a subpoena (whether civil or criminal) or similar process.
Investigating Wrongdoing and Protecting Ourselves or Third Parties:
To enforce or investigate any potential violation of our Terms of Service and policies, any potential violation of the law and to protect ourselves, our Customers, or any third party from any potential harm (whether tangible or intangible).
4. Data Sharing
Back to top
We may disclose data about you:
With our Audience Partners:
We share hashed email addresses or other pseudonymous online identifiers with our Audience Partners in connection with audience creation and modeling and creating segments.
With our Advertising Partners:
We disclose cookie ID data and the ad we propose to serve to you with our Advertising Partners, as necessary, to allow for successful delivery of ads to your device.
With our Service Providers:
We contract with companies who help with parts of our business operations (e.g., website and data hosting, fraud prevention, viewability reporting, data hygiene, marketing and email delivery), as well as billing, collections, tech, customer and operational support.
With our Subsidiaries and Affiliates:
These entities will only process your data for the purposes already explained in this Website Privacy Notice. Our subsidiaries are NextRoll Limited (Ireland), AdRoll Limited (UK) and NextRoll Pty Limited (Australia).
In connection with legal proceedings:
When we are under a legal obligation to do so, for example to comply with a binding order of a court, or where disclosure is necessary to exercise, establish or defend the legal rights of NextRoll, our Customers or any other third party.
In connection with a sale of our business:
If a third party acquires some or all of our business or assets, we may disclose your information in connection with the sale (including during due diligence in preparation for the sale).
5. Aggregated and De-Identified Data
Back to top
NextRoll may aggregate and de-identify data it collects so that it can either no longer be directly associated with a natural person or cannot be associated with a natural person at all.  NextRoll will then use such data for our machine learning, reporting, and other business purposes.
We may also share aggregated and de-identified data with our subsidiaries and affiliates and third parties, including with our Advertising Partners. For example, we may conduct industry wide surveys to publish benchmark reports, or to include statistics when collaborating with researchers or other companies on industry white papers.
6. Cookies and Related Technologies
Back to top
Our websites use cookies, tracking pixels and related technologies to operate and personalize our sites.  For example, to provide personalized content on our site, enable customer service chat functionality, for analytics purposes, and to target ads to you about our products and services on other websites.
We also use cookies, tracking pixels and related technologies to provide our services for our Customers. Cookies are small data files that are served by our platform and stored on your device.  You can refuse consent to, or opt-out of, NextRoll cookies at any time, as explained in
Your Choices and Opting-out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
below.
Tracking cookies
enable us to identify your device when you move between different Digital Properties, so that we can serve targeted advertising to you.
The NextRoll cookie we serve through the NextRoll platform for this purpose is named “__adroll,” “__ar_v4” and “__adroll_fpc”.
Our Advertising Partners may also drop cookies for the purposes described in
What Data We Collect
. Generally, the type of cookies dropped will vary depending on the Advertising Partner. We provide a list of our Advertising Pixel Partners
here
.
Additionally, we use
non-tracking cookies
to store user decisions in terms of your ad consent and opt-out choices:
We may drop an __adroll cookie with value opt-out if you opt-out as described below.
We may drop a __consent cookie that stores the consent choices you have made regarding data processing and advertising by NextRoll.
A full list of NextRoll cookies is set out below:
Tracking cookies
Non-tracking cookies
__adroll
__ar_v4
__adroll_fpc
__adroll_consent_paramas
__adroll_post_consent_html
__adroll_post_connsent_css
7. Non-Cookie Technology for Tracking Outside European Territories
Back to top
In respect of website visitors with IP addresses
not from a European Territory
, NextRoll and some of our Advertising Partners may use technologies other than cookie technology to recognize your computer, device or browser for the purpose of interest-based advertising, analyzing engagement with ads or content, measuring the effectiveness of a particular ad campaign or marketing effort, monitoring against fraud or misuse of our Services, or in other ways described in this Website Privacy Notice in
How We Use the Data We Collect
. This use of non-cookie technology may be used in addition to cookies, or separately, to collect and record data about your web browsing activities on browsers, search engines or other platforms that may not utilize NextRoll Technology. You may opt-out of tracking via non-cookie technologies by employing the respective opt-out techniques described in
Your Choices and Opting- Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics Ads
.
8. Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
Back to top
You can control how you share your data with NextRoll, including electing to “opt-out” of interest-based advertising altogether. Please visit our
opt-out webpage
to opt out.
Generally speaking, an opt-out allows you to direct NextRoll not to engage in a particular type of data collection.  There are many different ways that NextRoll collects data, different purposes for that data collection and different industry-specific and NextRoll-specific tools for opting-out.  We describe below the different options for controlling how NextRoll uses your data:
Web browser:
You can opt-out of receiving interest-based ads served by us or on our behalf by clicking on the blue icon
that typically appears in the corner of the ads we serve and following the instructions provided or by clicking
here
. Please note that this opt-out function is browser-specific and relies on an “opt-out cookie.” This means if you delete your cookies or upgrade your browser after having opted out, you will need to opt-out again.
Cross Device Opt-Out:
As described above, How We Use the Data We Collect, we may link multiple browsers or devices to the cookie ID, hashed email address or other unique identifiers associated with you. If you opt-out on a browser or device and we have more browsers or devices linked to you, we will extend your opt-out decision to the other linked browsers and devices. Since we only link users across browsers and devices in some conditions, there could be cases where you are still being tracked in a different browser or device we have not linked, and where we are treating you as a different user.
Mobile Device Opt-Out:
To opt-out of receiving targeted ads that are based on your behavior across different mobile applications see the following instructions, for iOS and Android devices:
iOS 7 or Higher:
Go to your Settings > Select Privacy > Select Advertising > Enable the “Limit Ad Tracking” setting; and
For Android devices with OS 2.2 or higher and Google Play Services version 4.0 or higher:
Open your Google Settings app > Select Ads > Enable “Opt-out of interest-based advertising.”
Industry Opt-Out Tools and Self-Regulation:
NextRoll is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adheres to the framework principles. You may use the NAI opt-out tool
here
, which will allow you to opt-out of seeing personalized ads from us and from other NAI approved member companies. In addition, the NAI opt-out tool allows you to separately opt-out of “audience matched” advertising through the NAI’s “Audience Matched Advertising Opt-Out” tool. You can also use the
email opt-out tool
provided by our Advertising Partner, LiveRamp, to opt your email address from their database. Audience matching is a particular type of interest-based advertising where de-identified data (e.g. hashed emails) is tied to “offline” activity or information (generally, information that is or can be associated with a consumer’s email address) and matches that de-identified data to cookies, mobile ad IDs or other online identifiers. We describe this hashing activity in detail in
What Data We Collect
. Because this “audience matched” information is derived from an email address or information that can be tied to an email address, it is possible to opt-out with an email address. However, when you opt-out in this way, you will need to submit all of the email addresses that you use for the opt-out to work.
We also comply with the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners via the
DAA website
.
We also comply with the Canadian Self-regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising as managed by the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC). You may opt-out of receiving personalized ads from other companies that perform ad targeting services, including some that we may work with as Advertising Partners via the
DAAC website
.
Finally, we also adhere to the European Interactive Advertising Digital Alliance (EDAA) guidelines for online advertising. You may opt-out via the
EDAA website
.
You can also request that we stop email marketing to you. You can use the “unsubscribe link” in our marketing emails or contact
support@nextroll.com
.
9. Data retention
Back to top
We retain data for as long as necessary to perform our Services and for the purposes described in this Website Privacy Notice. For example, we may retain:
billing information as necessary to meet audit requirements;
login information to confirm when Customers accepted our Terms of Service; and
information as long as necessary to meet legal requirements, resolve disputes or enforce agreements.
We retain cookie data such as device and browser information, ad data and data collected on our Digital Properties as follows:
Mobile Identifiers and Cookie Identifiers:
Cookie identifiers we collect expire (and are then deleted) 13 months from the last time your device accessed a Digital Property using our technology. If you visit another Digital Property that uses NextRoll Technology inside that 13-month expiry period, then the expiry period will be reset and measured from that date instead. The expiration period for mobile identifiers is controlled by you on your device.
Personal Data Associated with Mobile and Cookie Identifiers Related to Browsing History:
We delete personal data associated with mobile and cookie identifiers after 12 months (for example, data such as a NextRoll Digital Property you visited or NextRoll ads that you may have clicked).
Personal Data Associated with Advertising Bidding Requests:
Data logged in order to process an advertising bid request we have received from an Advertising Partner (such as cookie identifier, IP address, the domain url requesting to display the ad and browser information) are deleted after 7 days. Data we have logged regarding bids we have placed to display an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, mobile identifiers, the advertisable bid on and the advertisable won or displayed to the visitor) are deleted after 15 days.
Personal Data Associated with the Display of an Advertisement:
Data logged for the display of an advertisement (including cookie identifiers, the advertisement won or displayed to you and data indicating whether you clicked on the particular advertisement displayed) are deleted after 12 months.
10. Security
Back to top
We apply technical, administrative and organizational security measures to protect the data we collect against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure or access, in particular where the processing involves the transmission of data over a network, and against other unlawful forms of processing.
11. International Transfers
Back to top
We may transfer the information we collect about you to countries (including the United States of America) other than the country where we originally collected it for the purposes of performing  our Services. In general, these countries will be the countries in which we or our service providers operate.
Those countries may not have the same data protection laws as your country. However, when we transfer your information to other countries, we will protect that information as described in this Website Privacy Notice and take steps, where necessary, to ensure that international transfers comply with applicable laws.
For example, when we transfer your information from a European Territory (as defined below) to our parent company in the United States, we do so under the European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses. When we transfer your data outside of a European Territory to Advertising Partners (or vice versa), we do so under lawful data export mechanisms which may include Standard Contractual Clauses and Binding Corporate Rules.
12. Information for European Territory Residents: Our Legal Basis and Your Rights
Back to top
Our Legal Basis:
If you are a visitor from the European Territories, our legal basis for collecting and using the personal data described above will depend on the personal information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it. "European Territories" mean the European Economic Area and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Website Privacy Notice, the term "European Territories" shall continue to include the United Kingdom.
We will typically collect personal data from you based on your consent. For example, when you visit one of our Digital Properties, you will be asked to consent to NextRoll dropping a cookie. We also collect personal data where the purpose of processing is based on NextRoll’s legitimate interest, as described in the “vendor” details of the Consent Management Tool presented to you . For example, to administer our platforms and provide our Services and fulfil our contractual obligations as a service provider.
If you have questions or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please contact us first at
support@nextroll.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
.
European Residents Privacy Rights:
If you are a resident of a European Territory, you have the following enhanced rights under EU data protection law:
If you wish to
access, correct, update or request deletion
of your personal information, please complete the information on this
webpage
to obtain a verifiable request.
If you wish to
object
to us processing your personal data or would like to otherwise restrict the processing of your personal data, we will honor that request. Please visit the
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
portion of this Privacy Notice to select the best opt-out method for you.
Similarly, if we process your personal data with your consent,
then you can withdraw your consent at any time
. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. You can also refuse consent for NextRoll or our Advertising Partners to drop cookies by visiting our
opt-out page
or by refusing consent for NextRoll when you see a Consent Management Tool displayed on websites which lists NextRoll as a vendor.
You have the
right to complain
to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. Contact details for data protection authorities in the European Territories are available from the European Data Protection Board
website
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your personal data, we encourage you to contact us first at
support@nextroll.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
.
13. Information For California Residents Only
Back to top
This section supplements the information contained in this Website Privacy Notice and applies solely to visitors, users, and others who are residents of the State of California, as defined in Section 17014 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations. This section is provided to comply with the
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
(as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (CPRA), and regulations promulgated thereunder as each may be amended from time to time (collectively the “CCPA”).
Any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this section.
For the purposes of this section “
Services
” shall mean performing advertising and marketing services for NextRoll’s purposes as well as maintaining or servicing NextRoll Customer accounts, providing Customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying Customer information and processing payments.
Information We Collect and the Purposes for Which this Information is Used
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device (“
personal information
”).  This collection of information is listed in
What Data We Collect
.
We set out below the CCPA categories of personal information we have collected from consumers within the last twelve (12) months who are NextRoll Customers and/or visitors of the NextRoll’s Digital Properties. Personal information in certain categories may overlap with other categories.
A.
Identifiers
Yes
Device IP address, email address, cookie string data, pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails), operating system, and your device type, and mobile device's identifier (such as the Apple IDFA or Android Advertising ID) and any other unique identifier that may be assigned to any device by third parties and cross-referenced to recognize a device.
Directly and indirectly from consumers, third party data providers, ad exchanges, supply-side platforms and Audience Partners. In the case of business email addresses, RollWorks B2B Services may infer a business email address.
B.
Personal information listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
Yes
Name, business address, business telephone number, education, employment, employment history, credit card number or other payment account information.
Directly from consumers and Audience Partners.
C.
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
No
-
-
D.
Commercial information
Yes
Records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Directly from consumers.
E.
Biometric information
No
-
-
F.
Internet or other similar network activity
Yes
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application, or advertisement. For example, which pages you visited and when, what items were clicked on a page, how much time was spent on a page, whether you downloaded a white paper on a B2B website, what items you placed into your online shopping cart, what products were purchased and the price of the products purchased.
Directly from browsing history on our Digital Properties.
Non-personal information about one of our ads (e.g. the third party who served the ad, and the name of the ad) may be connected with browsing history or activity on our websites for the purposes of determining attribution information (e.g. whether particular ad led to a consumer visiting our website, and, if so, which particular ad campaign).
G.
Geolocation data
Yes
Non-precise geolocation derived from IP address.
Directly from consumers, ad exchanges, publishers and supply-side platforms and Audience Partners.
H.
Sensory data
No
-
-
I.
Professional or employment-related information
Yes
Current or past job history, including details about the employer (industry, name, company location, company domain or URL), and employee (positions held, duration of employment, and office location of the company where the employee worked).
Third party data providers and AudiencePartners.
J.
Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R Part 99))
No
-
-
K.
Inferences drawn from other personal information
Yes
Creating profiles that reflect consumer preferences and interests.
Audience partners.
L.
Sensitive Personal Information
Personal information that reveals a consumer’s financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account.
Customers
Purposes for Which Personal Information is Collected
All data we collect pursuant to this Website Privacy Notice is primarily for the commercial purpose of performing advertising and marketing services for our own purposes as well as maintaining or servicing our Customer accounts, providing Customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information and processing payments. We also use data collected for the following additional business purposes:
Auditing Interactions with Consumers:
count ad impressions and verify the quality of ad impressions served to unique visitors identified by cookie IDor other unique identifier;
Debugging and Repair:
the identification and repair of impairments to intended and existing functionalities in our Services and NextRoll Technology, perform debugging and related activities to repair errors that impair the functionality of our Services;
Security:
to detect security incidents and protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, including, when necessary, to prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Internal Research and Development:
conduct internal research for technological development of our Services and demonstration of the performance of these Services; and
Quality and Safety Maintenance and Verification:
verify the quality or safety of our Services and improve, upgrade or enhance our Services and NextRoll Technology.
For more information on how we use this data, please refer to
How We Use the Data We Collect
.
Disclosures of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
NextRoll discloses personal data for business purposes as set out in Purposes for which Personal Information is Collected above. We disclose, or otherwise share as indicated below, the categories of personal information to the categories of third parties as set out in
Data Sharing
.
Sharing and Selling Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have shared and/or sold the following categories of personal information for the commercial purpose of  of providing cross-context behavioral advertising (known as retargeted or interest based advertising) services:
Category A (Identifiers). By serving ads on digital publisher sites such as news, blogs and weather sites we share and/or sell cookie string data and pseudonymous data (e.g. hashed emails) from Category A (identifiers) with Advertising Partners and Advertising Partners.
NextRoll does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares the personal information of minors.
To opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information, visit our
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
page.
Furthermore, NextRoll processes interest based advertising opt-out preference signals via global privacy controls. To use this method, you must download and enable global privacy controls on a participating browser or browser extension.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes the rights of California residents under CCPA and provides information on how to exercise those rights.
Right to Know and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information;
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (otherwise known as a data portability request); and
Two separate lists where we have sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose:
Sales: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
Disclosures for a business purpose: identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained
Right to Delete
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collect from you and retain, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability and Right to Correct
), we will delete (and direct our services providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relations with you or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided by law;
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 et. seq.);
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information’s deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research’s achievement, if you previously provided informed consent;
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation; and
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Right to Correct
You have the right to request that a business correct inaccurate personal Information that is maintains about you, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal Information.
Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
), we will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct (and direct our service providers to do the same) your personal information, unless an exception applies.
Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability, Right to Deletion, and Right to Correct
To exercise the access, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit the consumer request to us by either.
Calling us at 1-844-740-7126; or
Visiting our privacy requests
webpage
.
After submitting the request, a form will be sent to the requestor to verify the consumer request.
On the verification from, the requestor must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative; and
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
Only you, or a person that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot: (i) verify your identity or authority to make the request; and (ii) confirm the personal information relates to you.
We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing and Format
We will deliver our written response to you electronically unless you indicate delivery to be by mail.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot complete a request, if applicable. Please note that personal information deleted during this period as set out in
Data Retention
will not be provided.
The format of our responses to you concerning personal information collected, disclosed or sold will be provided in a readily usable format that should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Right to Opt out of the Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information
To exercise the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of your personal information you (or your authorized representative) may visit the
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
webpage.
Opt Out Preference Signals
If you are visiting a NextRoll Digital Property, you may opt-out of the sale or sharing of your data by broadcasting an Opt-Out Preference Signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) (on the browsers and/or browser extensions that support such a signal). If you do not have an account on the site you are browsing or if you are not logged into your account while browsing, your request to opt-out will be linked to your browser identifier only and not linked to any account information because the connection between your browser and the account is not known to NextRoll. If you would like us to make the connection between your browser and your account when you send the opt out request or GPC signal, and you have not yet opted out, you can do so here.
Personal Information Sales Opt-Out Rights
To exercise the right to opt-out of interest-based advertising, you (or your authorized representative) may submit a request to us by visiting the
Do Not Sell or Share My Information
webpage.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services;
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties;
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services; or
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
14. Information for Non-California Residents in US States with Data Privacy Laws
Back to top
Exercising Your Consumer Rights.
Several US state privacy laws provide residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. Consumers in these states can exercise their rights via the methods described above under the headings:in Exercising Right to Know, Data Portability; Right to Deletion; and Right to Correct. To appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, or to contact NextRoll, please view the Contact Us About Questions section.
The Sale of Personal Information and Processing for Targeted Advertising
For information on the sale of your personal information and how to opt out, see
Sales of Personal Information
. NextRoll processes personal information for targeted advertising. See
How We Use the Data We Collect
above. To opt out of targeted advertising, see
Your Choices and Opting-Out of Interest-Based Advertising and Analytics
, or visit the “Privacy Choices” link in the footer of all NextRoll webpages:
15. Information for Individuals Located in Brazil
Back to top
Please view NextRoll’s disclosures pursuant to the Brazilian Data Protection Law, the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”),
here
.
16. Changes to this Privacy Notice
Back to top
We may update or modify this Website Privacy Notice at our discretion at any time. When we make changes to this Website Privacy Notice, we will post the updated notice online and update the notice’s effective date. Please review this Website Privacy Notice periodically.
If we are required by applicable law to obtain your consent to any material changes before they come into effect, then we will do so in accordance with law.
17. Contact Us About Questions
Back to top
If you have any questions about this Service Privacy Notice or our privacy practices, or want to appeal NextRoll’s decision as a Controller with regard to a consumer request, you can contact support@nextroll.com.
If you are located in a European Territory then, where we process your data as a data controller, NextRoll Limited is the data controller of your information. To contact NextRoll Limited please email support@nextroll.com or write to us at the following address:
NextRoll Limited
Attn: Legal
Floor 3, Block 3
Miesian Plaza
Dublin 2, Ireland
D02 Y754
If you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@nextroll.com
or by writing to the following address:
Address:
Lucid Privacy Group
Attention: NextRoll Data Protection Officer
1050 Page Street
San Francisco, CA 94117
USA
Sub-policy 7
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Sub-policy 8
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework-article/ANNEX-I-introduction:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;